Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
Number of Reviews
44

Author
George Papadopoulos
James L. Brooks loves people. He loves the way people form relationships,
the way they communicate, their emotions, their ups and downs and, above
all, their humanity. His films don't have epic narratives, digital special
effects or exotic locations. They often take place in city streets, cramped
apartments and suburban houses. The characters are everyday, down-to-earth
people who have their little eccentricities and personal problems but we
are left to admire their grace and integrity as they battle through life's
uncertainties. 
AS GOOD AS IT GETS is James Brooks' most ambitious film in that he spends
more time on developing the characters here and the slim plot is incidental
rather than essential to the narrative. There is no rush to get to the
point. We're not quite sure where we are heading but we are enjoying the
ride and with Jack Nicholson leading us, we are quite content to allow the
film to indulge us in its many pleasures.
What I loved about this film was its honest depiction of three
emotionally-flawed characters, all on the verge of a mental breakdown.
Individually, they have scraped the bottom of life's barrel: Melvin
(Nicholson) is suffering from obsessive-compulsive behaviour, Carol (Hunt)
has a seriously ill asthmatic son and Simon (Kinnear) was viciously bashed
and is financially broke forcing him to end his career as an artist. These
are not your traditional movie heroes and this is not a conventional
Hollywood film. Its leisurely pace will unsettle a few viewers and its
reluctance to go for the easy solution may be annoying to some. However,
these qualities are its strengths and makes this the best film yet by
Brooks and, in my opinion, is on equal footing with THE ICE STORM as the
best film of the year. Don't be surprised if it picks up Best Picture
Oscar, either.
Films depicting romantic relationships between an older man and a woman 25
years his junior are few and far between. AS GOOD AS IT GETS is very
European in this way. The French have been producing romantic films of an
older man and a younger woman for years now. Just a few gems to mention
are: NELLY AND MR.ARNAUD, LA BELLE NOISSEUSE and THREE COLOURS RED (yes, it
was a romance). Brooks' film also shares their loose narrative style,
virtual absence of plot, exclusive concentration on character development
and disregard for neat resolutions. 

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   "It's not always good to let things calm down," advises
Simon Bishop (Greg Kinnear) when his next-door neighbor
Melvin Udall (Jack Nicholson) hesitates to pursue a romance. 
"As Good As It Gets" is a rare romantic comedy in which the
audience does not have to worry: things never get too calm,
particularly when its lead performer inhabits the role of an
obsessive-compulsive misanthrope whom Moliere would
probably write about if the great French playwright were alive
today.  James L. Brooks, who co-wrote the script and directed
it with precise comic timing is, as critic David Thomson
describes, "living proof that American television, week after
week, can deliver smart, well-written, beautifully played
comedy series that are devoted to being decent and humane
without seeming smug or idiotic."  With Jack Nicholson in his
classic role as a highly-strung urbanite and Helen Hunt as
Carol Connelly, the woman who makes a mensch out of him,
"As Good As It Gets" is perhaps the year's smartest comedy. 
To Brooks's credit, the film's romantic theme even draws
great moments of sympathy for its three principal characters,
all of whom seem destined to have happiness forever elude
them.  
   At one point in the tender and whimsical tale, Melvin pays a
surprise visit to his psychoanalyst, Dr. Green (Lawrence
Kasdan) and, looking with dismay at the sad sacks in the
waiting room asks himself, "Is this as good as it gets?" 
Considering that the man is a highly successful writer of sixty-
two novels living on a classy street in New York's Greenwich
Village, we are at first surprised that life could appear to him 
prosaic, at best.  But this film will assure those of us with very
ordinary incomes that money and fame do not automatically
guarantee happiness.  Melvin Udall is the sort of guy who is
really not out in the world, not the kind who would attend
writers' conferences in the Hamptons or even know that there
are certain rules that govern civilized speech.  He seems
either happy about his capacity to insult people with almost
every comment he makes or completely unaware of his effect
on humanity, all of whom are more likely than not to cross the
street upon seeing him or hide from their waitress stations in
restaurants when he approaches their tables.  Luckily for
Melvin, though, he has a soft spot for the only waitress he will
allow to serve him, the only one, in fact, who will put up with
his abuse--Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt) who is in her late
thirties and is troubled with a chronically asthmatic little boy
who is often left in the care of Carol's mother, Beverly (Shirley
Knight).
   In what is easily his best role to date, Greg Kinnear shines
as Melvin's gay next-door neighbor whose Brussels Griffon
dog Verdell (Jill) is sent down the compactor chute by Melvin,
who hates dogs as much as he dislikes people.  Scripters
James L. Brooks and Mark Andrus score points for irony in
showing how the little dog, the love of Simon's life, actually
shows a preference for Melvin's company--so much so that
even when his owner holds up a strip of bacon and invites the
dog to come, Verdell heads right for Melvin's arms.
   Until the very conclusion of the film, Melvin seems
completely unable to filter out his anti-social feelings before
expressing them or, as some would say more appropriately,
to engage the brain before putting the mouth into motion. 
When Simon is severely attacked and confined to a
wheelchair by the jealous lover of a man (Skeet Ulrich) he is
sketching, Melvin assures him "You'll be back on your knees
in no time," and when a woman of Latin American
background speaks to him with a flourish, he asks, "Where
did you pick up that talk...in some Panama City hump-hump
bar?"  Despite his affection for Carol, while he spends an
evening with her at a posh restaurant in which he is not
admitted until he puts on a jacket and tie, he complains to her
that they let her enter wearing just a housedress while he has
to be inconvenienced by the establishment's dress code.
   Brooks evokes a wonderful, Oscar-potential performance
from Helen Hunt, an archetypal working-class woman who will
remind TV viewers of Alice Kramden, as she juggles her life
from her modest Prospect Park, Brooklyn apartment to her job
as a server in a middle-class Manhattan restaurant.  She
leaves no question that she is eager for a hug and more but
cannot find a normal guy to be her boy friend, which does not
surprise her mother, who explains, "They don't exist."  
Fishing perpetually for compliments, even from the cynical
Melvin, she is almost continually wide-eyed, waiting for him to
complete his sentences, prompting him for the right words
which seem never to arrive.  Jack Nicholson's career is back
on track after his indifferent job in "Mars Attacks."  Nicholson
is once again the paradigmatic New Yorker, the sort who
does not suffer fools (or even wise folks) gladly--who swept
the table clear in his famous scene with Karen Black in "Five
Easy Pieces."  With the further support of Greg Kinnear, who
turns in a surprisingly agile performance as a hard-luck guy
who gets to know and even love the man who at first piqued
him, "As Good As It Gets" is a convincingly upbeat and
encouraging story of three unhappy and disparate people who
find one another and realize that life can be agreeable. Rated
PG-13.  Running Time: 130 minutes.  (C) 1997 Harvey Karten

Author
Brian Takeshita
Jack Nicholson has a funny way of playing characters with very few
redeeming qualities, but whom you end up liking anyway.  In AS GOOD AS
IT GETS, the character in question is Melvin Udall, a successful
novelist with obsessive-compulsive disorder who seems bent on having
as little contact with people around him as possible, except when he
feels like being a royal pain in the you-know-where.  He's mean.  I
mean really mean.  The opening scene shows him shoving a little dog
down the trash chute of his Manhattan condominium.
Every day, Melvin eats at the same cafe, sits at the same table, and
gets served by the same waitress.  You can tell that this is his
favorite place to be a vicious nuisance, when his waitress Carol
(Helen Hunt) tells him he can just go sit in another section, and all
the other waitresses just cringe.  One day, Melvin makes a comment
that goes to far, and Carol, genuinely hurt, comes down on him like a
ton of bricks.  At that point we find that she is not only the only
person who can put up with him as a matter of course, but is also the
only person who can get to him, too.
Another person who often crosses Melvin's sights is Simon (Greg
Kinnear), an artist who lives on Melvin's floor.  Aside from the fact
that he lives near the terror of the city, Simon has the added benefit
of being gay, making him a prime target.  Simon's friend Frank (Cuba
Gooding, Jr.), also gay, does not fare much better.  When Simon walks
in on a pair of men robbing his apartment, he is brutally beaten and
sent to the hospital, and Frank, who has grown tired of seeing his
friend take the verbal abuse dished out by his neighbor, intimidates
Melvin into watching after Simon's dog while he convalesces.  This is
the same dog Melvin had earlier shoved down the garbage.
An interesting thing happens when Melvin takes this dog in:  Melvin
gets to like the dog, and the two develop an attachment which is the
catalyst to Melvin's softening up to the world around him.  It doesn't
happen overnight, but throughout the film, he bites his tongue here,
cares a little there, and most miraculously, falls in love.  One of
the best elements of this film is watching Melvin try to express
feelings which are not the usual negative ones he so often shares with
others.  He's traveling terra incognita here, and it shows.
Good performances are turned in by all principal players in this film,
especially by Nicholson and Hunt.  They play well off of each other
and have a genuine chemistry which makes it a pleasure to watch them
on screen.  Greg Kinnear, who is becoming known for his supporting
film roles, is also very good at playing the vulnerable Simon.  He
gives a short monologue about what it means for him to be an artist,
and delivers it with such inspiration and conviction that you actually
get to feel some of what he feels.  Cuba Gooding Jr. performs with a
hyped-up level of energy which contrasts nicely with that of Kinnear,
and comes through with a near constant comic performance.
The screenplay, by Mark Andrus and James L. Brooks, is clever,
touching, and funny.  The best part about it, however, is that it is
filled with characters we care about because they are actually
interesting.  Melvin is a man we can't quite figure out, but whose
mannerisms and quirky qualities capture our attention.  Carol is a
working woman living with her mother, trying to take care of a child
with a debilitating respiratory problem.  Simon is a man who is a
success in his circle of peers, but who is still not accepted by much
of society.  Combined with the talent of the actors, these characters
make the film.  The one noticeable area where the film is lacking,
however, is the absence of Cuba Gooding, Jr. through the second half.
His character makes an exit which is supposed to be temporary, but the
film ends before his return, leaving his relationship with Simon and
Melvin unresolved.  I would have liked to have seen more of his
character in general, in addition to a part in the film's conclusion.
There's one actor, who will probably not be recognized by any awards,
but who contributes greatly to many of the movie's best scenes and who
deserves mention.  This is that little dog.  He plays such a pivotal
role to Melvin's character development, actually serves to forward the
plot, and has some absolutely scene-stealing moments, that it is hard
to believe he is simply an animal.  Award or no, however, when even
the dog puts in a good performance, you know you've got an outstanding
movie.

Author
E. Benjamin Kelsey
Leave it to Jack Nicholson to make one of the most repugnant, most
disgraceful, most politically incorrect characters of recent memory into one
of the most enjoyable, most likeable, and most captivating characters of the
year. I'm speaking of none other than Melvin Udall, Nicholson's latest
persona, in the James L. Brooks film AS GOOD AS IT GETS.
So what is it that makes Melvin so despicable? Well where do we begin? True,
we're not likely to see Nicholson in a John Hughes film or playing Mr. Rogers
in a big screen adaption of the children's show (or a mixture of the two!),
but Melvin is particularly vicious - even for Nicholson. Does he tear down
doors with an axe? No. Is he Satan? No. But the comments Melvin spouts off
were even able to derive synchronous moans of disbelief from a packed movie
theater, and, at times, laughs just as hearty.
An obsessive-compulsive romance novelist, Melvin resides in an apartment
building where he shares a mutual disdain for his fellow tenants, particulary
with neighboring gay artist, Simon Bishop (Greg Kinnear). Simon's pet dog
Verdell is the center of the rivalry, and when Verdell attempts to mark his
territory one last time, Melvin winds up throwing the dog down a garbage
chute. The dog is safely recovered, but it's obvious who the culprit is, and
with dignity, and a fair amount of fear, Simon approaches Melvin about it. The
only thing accomplished is a two-minute rip into Simon's homosexual lifestyle
as Melvin delivers one of the first harsh politically-incorrect speeches of
the film.
It's hard to imagine Melvin feeling a need for anyone, even if it is in a
selfish manner. This is the case with Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt), a single
mother who also happens to be the only waitress Melvin can handle having serve
him (which is good because no other waitresses are willing to do it). On a
daily basis, at a regular time, Melvin finds himself at the restaurant Carol
works at, and if his usual table is occupied, you can expect a slew of insults
will be thrown at the "trespassers" until it's vacated. Through casual
eavesdropping, Melvin knows that Carol's son is critically ill, and while this
begins as an obstacle to their relationship, it will eventually result in a
closer bond between the two.
That's the gist of it. AS GOOD AS IT GETS is a rich blend of romantic-comedy
and character study. The cast here is impeccable, and nobody turns in a second
rate performance. Kinnear, who has never had reason to boast, is Oscar
territory here. When Simon is badly beaten in a botched robbery attempt, the
pain he endures is hard to watch, and Melvin's essentially uncontrollable lack
of sympathy can nearly bring tears to your eyes. In fact, Kinnear's character
might just rival the dog in terms of the hug-appeal. Also showing up is Cuba
Gooding Jr. who won an Oscar for his role in JERRY MAGUIRE. Here he plays
Simon's art dealer, and likely more, Frank Sachs. Gooding's role isn't as
prevalent as commercials would have you believe, but when he's onscreen, he's
highly commendable.
The real stars here are Helen Hunt and Jack Nicholson. Hunt has never been so
outstanding, and she seems perfect for this role. Naturally she can't outshine
Nicholson, but who can? Realizing she's playing second fiddle to such an icon
only makes her terrific performance all the more praiseworthy. Nicholson is
finally back in a role that balances on his incredible acting talents. Without
him, Melvin would not have been Melvin, and the movie very likely could be
less than mediocre. He carries that much weight. As many recent Oscar-caliber
performances as there's been, none scream it as loudly as Nicholson. Although
I hailed TITANIC as a leader for Oscar nominations, Nicholson *should* beat
out all others in the Best Actor category. I've said it before and I'll say it
again, nobody else, and I mean *nobody* else, could've done this role justice.
Mark Andrus and James L. Brooks put together one of the freshest scripts
Hollywood has seen in a while, particularly in a romantic-comedy. 1997 has
been particulary shallow in that market, with the best being FOOLS RUSH IN and
the under-appreciated PICTURE PERFECT. Although MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING is
getting all the hype (at least when discussing romantic-comedies), it is the
uniqueness of AS GOOD AS IT GETS that will (and should) win audiences over.
It's a sharp contrast to the usual "hip" sex comedies being pawned off as
romantic-comedies, and it doesn't star two mid-twenties models who fall
immediately in love and sleep with each other in the course of one evening.
Thankfully, AS GOOD AS IT GETS is something new in that department, and
sensible people will applaud the effort (successful effort mind you) of
creating a more genuine onscreen romance.
It's obviously going to be an overused sound-bite, but AS GOOD AS IT GETS
truly *is* as good as it gets. If you can read more than two reviews without
hearing that, I'll be amazed. And although I hate to fall victim to such an
obvious cliché, it's never been so accurate as in this case. AS GOOD AS IT
GETS' two-hour plus running time isn't likely to depreciate your movie going
experience. It's a particular comfort, when so many 80-minute movies can feel
way too long, to have a film like this come out - one that can keep your
attention, and help you escape reality, for a priceless two hours. So what's
the harm in going an extra eighteen minutes? If you're able to do it
successfully, as James L. Brooks so nicely has, then it's all the better.

Author
Harald Spyra [de]
Man sollte sich in diesem Film nicht zu frueh freuen. Zunaechst darf
Jack Nicholson so richtig fies sein. Er wirft einen suessen kleinen
Koeter in den Muellschlucker, beleidigt Schwarze, Homosexuelle, Frauen
und Juden. Fehlt nur noch, dass er auch die Nichtraucher-Lobby
herausfordert und sich grinsend eine Zigarette anzuendet. Das tut er
zwar nicht, aber fast eine Viertelstunde lang besteht die Hoffnung auf
boesartigen Witz. Doch "As Good As it Gets" ist ein Film von James L.
Brooks, den man nicht umsonst gelegentlich mit Frank Capra vergleicht.
Am Ende haben wir wieder nur ein Exemplar aus dem Streichelgehege des
Hollywood-Parks gesehen. Einen Film zum Knutschen. Eine uramerikanische,
politisch korrekte, warmherzige, Mut machende und optimistische
Komoedie. Einen unsagbar verlogenen Schmarren mithin.
Nicholson spielt hier einen Zwangsneurotiker. Helen Hunt ist eine kleine
Kellnerin, alleinerziehende Mutter eines an allergischem Asthma
leidenden Jungen. Greg Kinnear ist ein schwuler Maler, der von einer
Bande Strichjungen brutal zusammengeschlagen wird. Damit haben wir das
Personal eines packenden Psychodramas - oder einer bissigen Komoedie.
"As Good As it Gets" ist beides nicht. Die extremen Charaktere werden
nur zum Aufmotzen eines belanglosen Feelgood-Movies missbraucht.
In einigen Szenen darf Nicholson uns ahnen lassen, in was fuer einem
furchtbaren Wuergegriff seine Figur steckt. Doch diese Momente sind
schnell vorbei, und der Film macht uns weis, mit ein bisschen gutem
Willen von allen Seiten und der richtigen Frau seien die Fesseln seiner
entsetzlichen Erkrankung schnell gesprengt. Nicholson kommt hier einfach
als Misanthrop herueber, der gerne garstig spricht und ein paar komische
Marotten pflegt. Ein Rassist, ein Antisemit mit gutem Kern, der von den
Hormonen freigeschwemmt wird wird.
Helen Hunt kaempft gegen das amerikanische Gesundheitswesen ums
ueberleben ihres Sohnes. Aber mit ein bisschen Hilfe eines Traumprinzen
sind die Bronchien schnell und dauerhaft wieder frei. Flugs erkennt sie
auch, dass ihre erdrueckende Fuersorge dem Kleinen fast so sehr den Atem
rauben koennte wie das Asthma. Und so laesst sie eben los, um sich mehr
um sich selbst zu kuemmern. So einfach ist das. Auch dass der Traumprinz
fast 30 Jahre aelter ist als sie, stoert auf der Leinwand heute noch so
wenig wie zu Capras Zeiten.
Greg Kinnear ist ein suesser, sensibler, huebscher Schwuli, wie ihn das
weibliche Kinopublikum liebt und wie er das maennliche nicht weiter
beunruhigt. Nur so duerfen Schwule sein, wenn sie im Mainstream nicht
bloss die psychopathischen Killer spielen sollen. Der Film deutet sogar
an, die inzestuoese Beziehung des Malers zu seiner Mutter haette etwas
mit seiner Veranlagung zu tun. Haben wir's nicht immer gewusst?
Vielleicht hatte Brooks tatsaechlich mehr im Sinn. Vielleicht war
urspruenglich tatsaechlich geplant, die Charaktere besser auszuloten.
Doch dazu fehlte - wem auch immer - der Mut. Es waere ein grosses
Unterfangen gewesen. Doch es haette klappen koennen.
Es haette schon wegen der grossartigen Darsteller klappen muessen.
Besonders Nicholson und Hunt gelingen desoefteren atemberaubende
Momente.  Von Jack darf man dies erwarten. Wirklich ueberraschend ist
die Leistung des Darlings der amerikanischen Sitcom. Ausgerechnet sie
setzt einem Film von der Substanz einer Seifenoper immer wieder
brillante Glanzlichter auf. Helen Hunt gilt bei der Oscar-Verleihung
heuer als Favoritin, schon weil sie die einzige Amerikanerin neben vier
britischen Konkurrentinnen ist. Doch der Oscar ginge auch so in Ordnung.
Ebenso fuer Nicholson und auch fuer Kinnear, der es schafft, in einer
Klischeerolle jedem darstellerischen Klischee aus dem Weg zu gehen. Der
Oscar fuer den Film waere jedoch ein noch schlechterer Witz als der fuer
"Braveheart".
Fazit: Eine letztlich aergerliche Verschwendung herausragender Talente
und eines vielversprechenden Stoffes. Trotzdem sehenswert allein wegen
der grandiosen Hauptdarsteller. Sie sind wirklich "as good as it gets".

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: James L. Brooks
Cast: Jack Nicholson, Helen Hunt, Greg Kinnear, Cuba Gooding, Jr.,
Shirley Knight, Skeet Ulrich
Rated PG-13: Language, nudity, violence
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    I never thought any film labeled as a "romantic comedy" could be
this good. I always associate a certain vocabulary with films commonly
referred to as romantic comedies; words in this vocabulary
include--trite, phony, contrived, dull, formulaic, careful, and shallow.
I was relieved as I watched As Good as it Gets because I couldn't
associate any of these words with this film. In fact, James L. Brooks'
new film is the antithesis of all of these words combined, a moving,
often thought-provoking story about a truly awful individual.
    That individual is Melvin Udall, a racist, gay-hating,
obsessive-compulsive curmudgeon. He's also a novelist and lives in an
upper class apartment in New York. Across the hall is Simon (Greg
Kinnear), a gay artist who is, of course, extremely nice, and has a cute
little dog. Melvin eats lunch every day in the same diner, and his
waitress is always Carol (Helen Hunt), a mother just barely scraping by
because her son is sickly and always needing medical attention.
    One fateful day, Simon is painting a picture of a friend of a friend
(Skeet Ulrich), whose friends are in the other room, stealing all of
Simon's things. When Simon goes to investigate, he gets beaten within an
inch of his life. He loses all inspiration for painting and soon runs
out of money. Meanwhile, Melvin really likes Carol, and despite his
conduct towards her, he pays for real medical care for her son, who soon
recovers completely. Then, the three people unite in a road trip to
Baltimore in order for Simon to get money from his parents, to whom he
hasn't spoken in years.
    The first thing that really struck me about As Good as it Gets are
the risks it takes, in dialogue and ultimately in characterizations.
Melvin, for instance, is not one of those likable old curmudgeons--this
guy is really despicable. In one extremely tense scene, he makes the
mistake of insinuating that Carol's son doesn't have a long time to
live, and her reaction to this is one of complete emotional rage. He
also makes jokes--jokes that aren't really intended to be funny--about
people's weight, religion (he attacks Jews in one scene), and sexuality
(note the almost endless jokes about Simon and his homosexuality).
    Though these moments aren't exactly pleasant, they do help to create
a very solid character. This character is brought to life even more so
by Jack Nicholson's performance--as far as I'm concerned, this is his
best performance since One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest. Nicholson tends
to have that "I'm Jack Nicholson" aura around him when he's playing bad
guys or token characters, but here he gives a deep and convincing
performance as Melvin. Later developments of the character are extreme,
and we can still see the same old Melvin there, but we know he's trying
thanks to Nicholson.
    The supporting performances are of the best this year. Helen Hunt
proves once again that she can effortlessly upstage the sometimes
limited realm of television and gives a truly moving performance as a
strong-minded woman who really loves her son. Kinnear, too, goes way
beyond anything I've ever seen him in (I still remember him from Talk
Soup) and creates this frustrated man with ease.
    There is something truly magical and refreshing about this film--it
left me with a smile on my face that lasted for hours and hours after
the film was over. The mixture of different people is fascinating and
fun to watch. I loved these characters, and I loved their interactions
through Brooks' witty dialogue and realistic situations. I wanted to
believe that these people are alive somewhere in New York, just as
depicted in this film. And when the screen blacks out in the end, I knew
they were going to go right on living, and that everything would be
okay.

Author
James Sanford

AS GOOD AS IT GETS
(Tri-Star)
 "How do you write women so beautifully?" a gushing fan asks romance
novelist Melvin Udall (Jack Nicholson). "I think of a man," the scribe
replies, "and take away reason and accountability." That's one of the
gentler put-downs dispensed by this acid-tongued obsessive-compulsive, a
walking testament to the power of negative thinking, and in the mouth of
anyone but Nicholson such crude remarks would probably have been horrifying
rather than humorous.
 The miracle of "As Good As It Gets" lies in how writer-director James
Brooks delicately balances the tone of the picture between comedy and
pathos, an accomplishment that's truly astonishing, given the film's
138-minute running time. But Brooks' deft touch won't surprise those who
remember the skill he demonstrated in his Oscar-winning "Terms of
Endearment" (1983) and Oscar-nominated "Broadcast News" (1987): "As Good"
marks a smashing return-to-form.
 Several intertwining stories make up the movie's core. Early on, it appears
this will be a raucous farce about Melvin and his feud with a gay neighbor
named Simon (Greg Kinnear), a painter whose scuffy little dog irritates
Melvin to no end. But then the focus shifts to the cheerfully abrasive
relationship between Melvin and put-upon waitress Carol (Helen Hunt), the
only server in Melvin's favorite cafe who can stand him long enough to take
his order. Before long we're introduced to Carol's backstory, involving
rotten dates and a sickly son. Where is this movie going?
 Just sit back and savor the ride. Rest assured that eventually the various
strands will come together, and "As Good As It Gets" will emerge as a
sensational comedy that manages to celebrate life while at the same time
laughing at its strange twists of fate. The cast is pure magic: Nicholson,
in one of his most fully rounded performances in years, creates one of the
year's most memorable characters, but Hunt and Kinnear (who does a
magnificent Nicholson impersonation at one point) are equally fine in
less-showy parts. And Jill, the adorably ugly canine star, deserves credit
for her contribution to the film's success.
 While the holidays are often a time when consumers fall victim to the
inflated claims and hyperactive hype of advertisers, anyone buying a ticket
to "As Good As It Gets" can take comfort in knowing that, in this case, the
title doesn't lie.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Writer and director James L. Brooks, who has blessed us with
several wonderful films including TERMS OF ENDEARMENT and one of my all
time favorite movies, BROADCAST NEWS, gives the world a present this
Christmas called AS GOOD AS IT GETS.  Few movies live up to their
title, but this romantic comedy is indeed just about as good as it
gets.
     In the story Melvin Udall suffers from an obsessive-compulsive
disorder.  He will not walk on lines in the sidewalk, which makes
strolling down busy Manhattan sidewalks pretty tricky.  Walking on
tiled floors is almost impossible, too hard to avoid the cracks.  When
he enters his apartment he locks the door five times and then goes to
wash his hands.  With a medicine cabinet full of soaps he opens two
fresh ones, washes his hands in near-boiling water and discards the
soaps afterward.
     And if you think that this behavior is bizarre, wait until you see
how he treats his fellow human beings.  Jack Nicholson, in a perfect
bit of casting, plays Melvin with his foul mouth and his overscrubbed
body.
     Melvin, a highly successful romance novelist, lives to insult
people and with his own bit of equal opportunity he manages to be
obnoxious to everyone with the same fervor.  Fawning over him, the
receptionist at his publishers asks him, "How do you write women so
well?"  With a sneer he retorts, "I think of men, and I take away
reason and accountability."
     Nicholson's performance would remain just a fascinating side-show
were it not for the casting of Helen Hunt as Carol Connelly, the only
waitress in New York who can tolerate Melvin's behavior.  Her reactions
to his outlandish conduct and her ability to stand up to him are
precious.  "Do you have any control over how creepy you can get?" she
asks him.
     Reportedly Holly Hunter was to have Hunt's role but could not
agree on an acceptable salary.  As much as I admire Hunter's talents,
the other HH actress seems much better suited to the role of a
struggling waitress.  Never did I think of Hunt as an actress.  She
became a blue collar worker with a son with chronic, life-threatening
asthma and with a live-in mother all ensconced in a tiny apartment.
     To round out the picture Greg Kinnear plays Melvin's next-door
neighbor, Simon Bishop, a gay artist who gets down on his luck.  And in
a funny little part Cuba Gooding Jr. is Simon's friend Frank Sachs, an
antiques dealer, who tries to out macho Melvin but hates having to do
it.
     As I've suggested before, the difference between a good film and a
great one lies in how well it handles the small details.  Consider one
believable and riotously funny sequence.  Carol has trouble finding
boyfriends, what with her busy schedule, her tiny shared apartment and
her sick son.  When she finally gets a man up to her place, her son's
illness interrupts their first caress.  Upon returning to her date, his
crude fondling attempt ends in a squeal as he notices that she has a
little vomit left on her blouse.  He beats a fast exit as she realizes
that the complexities of being a poor, single mother has done her love
life in again.  Throughout this scene her mother carefully wears her
headphones so that she can afford Carol some privacy.
     Another measure of an outstanding film is whether it can break
certain motion picture axioms and get away with it.  One certainly is
that comedies, and most movies for that matter, should come in under
two hours.  Although this one is over two and a quarter hours long,
there simply is nothing to cut.  I loved all of the characters and
would have been happy to see the movie last another hour.  Even the dog
(a Brussels Griffon who is the spitting image of Gismo from GREMLINS)
sets a new standard for cinematic canine cuteness.  (Brooks toyed with
the idea of calling the movie, A DOG'S STORY.)
     If there is any justice in Hollywood then Nicholson, Hunt and
Kinnear will all get Academy Award acting nominations as well as Brooks
and his co-writer Mark Andrus for the intelligent script and Brooks for
the dead-on directing.
     That Melvin and Carol, who could not be more dissimilar, will fall
in love is obvious from the movie's setup, but that doesn't make
watching it anything less than enthralling.  In one of the movie's best
scenes, Carol forces a showdown.  Either Melvin gives her a compliment,
or she walks.  "You make me want to be a better man," he tells her
while straining every muscle in his face.  After a long pause, in which
you have no idea how she will react to his strange reply, she reflects,
"That's maybe the best compliment of my life."
     AS GOOD AS IT GETS runs 2:18.  It is rated PG-13 for strong
language, mature themes, brief nudity and a beating and would be fine
for kids around eleven and up.

Author
James Berardinelli
United States, 1997
U.S. Release Date: 12/25/97 (wide)
Running Length: 2:18
MPAA Classification: PG-13 (Nudity, profanity, mature themes, violence)
Theatrical Aspect Ratio: 1.85:1
Cast: Jack Nicholson, Helen Hunt, Greg Kinnear, Cuba Gooding Jr., 
      Shirley Knight, Skeet Ulrich
Director: James L. Brooks
Producers: James L. Brooks, Kristi Zea, Bridget Johnson
Screenplay: Mark Andrus and James L. Brooks
Cinematography: John Bailey
Music: Hans Zimmer
U.S. Distributor: TriStar Pictures
     AS GOOD AS IT GETS is a perfect Christmas release, not because the 
story takes place during the Yule season, but because many of the plot 
elements are straight out of Charles Dickens' A CHRISTMAS CAROL.  
There's more than just a little Scrooge in Melvin Udall (Jack 
Nicholson), the most unpleasant man in Manhattan.  And, like Scrooge, 
the unwilling sinner is on the road to redemption.  Instead of four 
ghosts, we have four living, breathing entities (one woman, two men, and 
a dog), but the result is the same.  By the time we leave the theater, 
the warmth of love has melted the coldest heart on Earth.  That's the 
reason this is called a "feel good" movie.
     AS GOOD AS IT GETS is really two related movies in one, which 
explains the surprisingly long running time.  While 138 minutes is fine 
for an epic adventure or a weighty drama, it makes a lightweight effort 
like this seem a little bloated.  The film is ambitious:  it tries to 
wed the modern-day, non-supernatural A CHRISTMAS CAROL with a 
traditional romantic comedy.  Director James L. Brooks, who does these 
kinds of movies as well as anyone in Hollywood, has moderate success.  
AS GOOD AS IT GETS is not a positive triumph, but it does bring a smile 
to the face and, perhaps in some cases, a tear to the eye.  
     Jack Nicholson plays Melvin, a successful author who lives the life 
of a recluse.  When the movie opens, he's depicted as so thoroughly 
rotten that it actually becomes difficult to root for him, even once he 
begins to mend his ways.  He's a homophobic, anti-Semitic racist with an 
intense dislike of dogs (he throws one down a garbage shoot) and people.  
Every time he opens his mouth, something vicious comes out.  The 
neighbors in his Greenwich Village apartment building all avoid him, and 
the waitress at his favorite restaurant barely tolerates his presence.  
To make matters worse, Melvin is afflicted with an obsessive/compulsive 
disorder that makes his behavior seem even more strange.  He brings his 
own utensils when he goes out to dinner, he refuses to step on sidewalk 
cracks, and he wears gloves all the time.
     Then something happens to change Melvin's life.  One of his 
neighbors, a gay artist named Simon (Greg Kinnear), is beaten up by a 
group of robbers.  Simon's dealer, Frank (Cuba Gooding Jr.), forces 
Melvin to care for Simon's dog.  Gradually, Melvin comes to love the 
little animal, and, after discovering a previously-unsuspected 
wellspring of humanity deep within himself, he begins exercising it in 
other ways:  paying a doctor to care for the sick son of his regular 
waitress, Carol (Helen Hunt), and offering Simon support when he comes 
home from the hospital.  Of course, no one can change overnight, and 
there are times when the old Melvin rears his ugly head, leading to plot 
complications.
     Nicholson is wonderful as Melvin the jerk.  He delivers the acid 
one-liners with real venom, has perfected the irritating mannerisms of 
an obsessive/compulsive individual, and generally makes it easy to 
accept the character as the last person you'd want to spend any time 
with.  As the kinder, gentler Melvin, however, he's not quiet as 
successful.  Vulnerability doesn't come easy to Nicholson, and the 
prickly side of his personality interferes with our acceptance of Melvin 
as a new man.  We get the feeling that as soon as the end credits roll, 
he's going to fall back into his old habits rather quickly.  He does 
have some great lines, though.  (For example, when explaining how he 
writes women so well in his books, Melvin comments, "I think of a man, 
then I take away reason and accountability.")
     Helen Hunt, last seen on the big screen in TWISTER but best known 
for her role in TV's "Mad About You", gives real breadth and depth to 
Carol, a woman who lives to serve her son and who doesn't know how to 
cope with Melvin's attention.  Like Melvin, the events in AS GOOD AS IT 
GETS transform Carol, but her gentler, gradual personality shift is more 
believable.  Hunt does a good job portraying Carol's weariness early in 
the film, followed by an almost-childlike joy as she rediscovers 
herself.  Alas, she and Nicholson never really click, which puts 
something of a damper on the romantic storyline.
     The real surprise is Greg Kinnear, who turns in a more solidly 
dramatic performance than we had a right to suspect based on his past 
record.  In SABRINA, Kinnear displayed a feckless charm, but here he's 
required to dig deeper.  Simon, an already-emotionally-wounded 
individual, has suffered a massive betrayal that has robbed him of the 
will to live, and Kinnear manages to capture the essence of this 
individual and bring it to life on screen.  The supporting cast includes 
veteran actress Shirley Knight as Carol's mother, Skeet Ulrich as one of 
Simon's models, and a scene-stealing dog.
     Ultimately, it's the quirks and details of AS GOOD AS IT GETS' 
script (by Brooks and co-writer Mark Andrus), rather than the broad 
strokes, which make the film enjoyable.  Essentially, this is a 
formulaic, connect-the-dots tale which offers few, if any surprises.  
Fifteen minutes into the movie, you'll be able to guess exactly how it 
will all work out.  As a result, the chief pleasure for the next two 
hours is watching the characters grow and interact as they traverse the 
familiar path.  AS GOOD AS IT GETS may not quite live up to its title, 
but it doesn't fall unacceptably short of the mark.
Now with more than 1300 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"No art passes our conscience in the way film does, and goes directly to our
feelings, deep down into the dark rooms of our souls"

Author
Rose Bruf
Omdat het onderwerp nu toch 'film' is, wou ik even vermelden dat ik
'Titanic' wel gezien heb, maar niet bespreek omdat :
        - de helft van de klas hem al bespreekt (ben ik zeker van omdat ik voor
hen 
           online documentatie gezocht heb)
        - ik יcht geen Leo DiCaprio-fan ben en tengevolge hiervan geen zin heb 
          om over deze (inhoudelijk ook nog beperkte) persoon te schrijven
        - ik het plot van de film aan de zwakke kant vind, en echt niet weet wat
-buiten           de mooie beeldrendering- iemand kan bezielen om 'zoiets' 9
oscars toe te                     kennen...
In plaats daarvan besloot ik 'As good as it gets' te bespreken, wat
wel-verdiend de oscars voor beste acteur & actrice wegkaapte.
De film begint met beelden van Melvin Udall, een geכerd schrijver, die
Verdell, de bhond van zijn homoseksuele buurman Simon, in de stortkoker
stopt. Na een korte woordenwisseling met Simon en diens vriend Frank
vertrekt Melvin, zoals elke dag, naar 'zijn' restaurant, waar men hem
liever ziet gaan dan komen. Zoals elke dag brengt dienster Carol Connelly
hem zijn onbijt, en zoals altijd beledigt hij haar. 
Ondertussen wordt Simon in elkaar geslagen (ייn van zijn vriendjes verdacht
hem onterecht van ontrouw) en zet Frank (omdat hij zelf te weinig tijd
heeft) Verdell bij Melvin af, die eerst niet weet waar hij het heeft, maar
als even later de hond er zich (noodgedwongen) bij neerlegt, toch wat
'steun' bij het dier vindt.
De volgende dag neemt Melvin Verdell mee naar het restaurant - hij zet hem
op de stoet in de hoop dat een of ander kind hem meeneemt. Carol vertelt
hem dat haar zoon Spencer erg lijdt onder zijn astma, maar Melvin blijkt
niet geןnteresseert te zijn.
Omdat Simon al wat hersteld is, wil hij Verdell graag terug. Melvin kan dit
niet verhin- deren, want Verdell is eigenlijk niet zijn hond. Verdell is
echter niet langer even dol op zijn baasje, en lijkt Melvins pesterijen en
pianospel haast wel te missen.
Nog een dagje later besluit Melvin een groot risico te nemen: in plaats van
direct naar het restaurant te gaan, loopt hij even binnen bij zijn
psychiater, waar hij kennelijk al lang niet meer geweest is. Die vindt dat
hij maar -zoals iedereen- een afspraak moet maken en dus op een andere keer
moet terugkomen. Zelfs na aandringen van Melvin wil hij niet toegeven, dus
loopt deze eerste terug het gebouw uit, maar niet voor hij aan de met
patiכnten gevulde wachtzaal verkondigd heeft dat dit misschien wel 'as good
as it gets' is... De rest van zijn dag verloopt al niet veel beter, want na
een 'inspannende' wandeling naar het restaurant -Melvin wil kost wat kost
niet in iets vuils trappen op straat- vindt hij daar niet zijn vertrouwde
Carol om zijn eten op te dienen, maar een olifantsachtige vrouw die niet
half zo veel geduld met hem heeft. Bijna wanhopig zoekt hij Carol thuis op,
die dat helemaal niet appreciכert, vooral niet wanneer Melvin haar zieke
zoon wat lessen in beleefdheid wil geven. Wanneer Melvin even later een
taxi wil nemen, komt Carol aanlopen met Spencer, die net een nieuwe aanval
kreeg. Melvin rijdt met hen mee naar het ziekenhuis en dan zonder meer
terug naar zijn flat.
Omdat hij het zou besterven als Carol hem niet meer zou bedienen, besluit
Melvin een dure, maar betere arts in te huren om voor Spencer te zorgen.
Omdat Carol denkt dat Melvin nu in ruil hier met haar wil slapen, besluit
ze hem dit midden in de nacht te komen vertellen, wat uitdraait op een erg
stuntelige conversatie zonder veel nut.
De volgende dag bedient Carol hem weer in 'zijn' restaurant. Carol wil hem
bedanken, maar kan er de woorden niet voor vinden, maar Melvin vindt dit
helemaal niet nodig. Voor ייn keer zit hij trouwens niet alleen aan 'zijn'
tafel; Frank komt hem vragen of hij Simon niet naar zijn ouders in
Baltimore wil rijden, in ruil mag hij de cabriolet lenen en kan hij er eens
tussenuit. Melvin vindt er helemaal niks aan, maar Carol zegt dat hij zich
moest schamen om zo'n kans te laten voorbijgaan; zijzelf zou direct akkoord
zijn. Melvin geeft dan maar toe en dwingt Carol mee te gaan, want dat is ze
hem toch verschuldigd, of niet ? 
De volgende dag vertrekken ze dan naar Baltimore, Melvin aan het stuur,
Simon ernaast en Carol achterin. De laatste twee kunnen het wel met elkaar
vinden, Simon vertelt haar over zijn zorgelijke kindertijd, terwijl Melvin
beweert dat zij allemaal zo zielig zijn omdat ze jaloers zijn op mensen die
wיl goeie herinneringen hebben. Wanneer ze aankomen in hun hotel, belt
Carol even naar huis, waar het zo goed met Spencer gaat dat hij zelfs terug
kan voetballen. Carol is zo blij dat ze een avond uit wil gaan en omdat
Simon zich niet zo goed voelt (zijn ouders nemen niet op wanneer hij belt),
besluit ze maar met Melvin te gaan. Ze gaan naar een duur restaurant, waar
Melvin eerst weigert een vest en das van de zaak te nemen, maar er waren
kledingsvoorschriften en dus koopt hij in een winkel in de buurt maar een
nieuwe vest en das. Nog voor het eten bestelt is, maakt Melvin de opmerking
dat 'hij zoveel kleren moet dragen, terwijl Carol in zo'n prulding van een
jurk binnenmag'. Carol dreigt op te stappen, tenzij als Melvin haar een
compliment zou maken, gewoon ייn keer. Eerst lijkt het erop dat alles
verloren is, maar Melvin besluit Carol te vertellen dat 'zij hem een betere
man wil laten zijn' en dat is voor Carol zelfs genoeg om naast zijn stoel
op de grond te gaan zitten en hem te kussen. Even later gaat het weer
helemaal fout, want wanneer zij hem vraagt waarom hij haar meegevraagd
heeft, antwoordt hij dat een van de redenen was dat 'zij Simon misschien
van zijn 'ziekte' (homoseksualiteit) kon afhelpen'. Nu kan Carol er niet
meer omheen: dit wordt niets. Ze gaat terug naar het hotel waar Simon,
wanneer hij haar zich toevallig ziet uitkleden, in haar een enorme
inspiratie terugvindt (die hij verloren was). Hij schetst haar portret en
wanneer Melvin laat thuis komt, vertellen ze hem dat 'het' fantastisch was,
en ze 'elkaar gewoon hebben vastgehouden'. Simon besluit dat hij zijn
ouders voor niets nodig heeft, de volgende ochtend vertrekken ze opnieuw.
Op de terugweg probeert Melvin Carol naar een romantisch liedje te laten
luisteren, maar zij ontwijkt zijn pogingen en vertelt hem nodat ze terug
thuis zijn dat 'hij haar een slecht gevoel geeft'. Omdat het gewoon nog
iets slechter kon, laat Melvin gedwee Simon bij hem intrekken, want die is
volledig blut en kan nergens heen.
 Even later belt Carol en hoewel ze niet weten wat ze moeten zeggen,
verloopt het gesprek betrekkelijk goed. Zo goed zelfs, dat Melvin besluit
bij haar langs te gaan. 
Daar vertelt hij haar dat hij het liefst van alles gewoon bij haar op de
trap zou willen zitten, wat Carol een aanleiding vindt om hem gestoord te
noemen. Gelukkig is haar moeder in de buurt om Carol te vertellen dat geen
enkel 'vriendje' normaal is. Wanneer Melvin hoort dat iemand hem haar
'vriendje' noemt, krijgt hij de moed om Carol mee te vragen voor een
nachtelijke wandeling, maar omdat Carol ook het concept van een nachtelijke
wandeling' gestoord noemt, verandert hij het even in 'verse, warme
koffiekoeken eten in een bakkerij die op dit vroege uur opent', wat ze dan
weer wel ziet zitten. Tijdens de nachtelijke wandeling (naar de bakkerij
die op dit vroege uur opent, waar ze verse, warme koffiekoeken gaan eten)
loopt Melvin naar gewoonte in een grote om de vuiligheden van de stad heen.
Wanneer hij ziet dat Carol ook dit gestoord vindt, besluit hij -om haar een
plezier te doen- toch maar in het midden van de stoep naast haar te gaan
lopen. Hij kust haar een paar keer, en dan gaan ze de -net geopende-
bakkerij binnen. Net voor Melvin binnengaat (Carol staat al te bestellen),
komt er een dienster met een vuilblik buiten...
'As good as it gets' vind ik wel een boeiende film, die 2 uur vlogen
voorbij zonder ze te verliezen en ondanks het feit dat dit echt niet mijn
'soort' film is. Hoe langer ik erover nadenk, hoe meer ik inzie dat de film
bestaat uit willekeurige interpersonele actie. Zonder dיze mensen, dיze
mensen was dםt niet gebeurd. Dat lijkt logisch, want de een verschil in
oorzaak veroorzaakt natuurlijk een verschil in gevolg. Maar je moet erbij
nadenken dat deze film een weerspiegeling is van het leven; deze mensen
konden eruit stappen, het einde veranderen. Het geeft een verontrustend
gevoel, alsof ik nu net ייn einde gezien heb en nog een keer moet gaan
kijken om te zien wat er dan zou gebeuren. En dan bedenk ik weer dat het
een film is. 
Echt inleven in de film kan je je niet, al de rollen zijn gevuld, behalve
die van nףg een saaie buur, maar meeleven des te meer. Je ziet de wanhoop,
de apathie van de maatschappij nog maar eens bevestigd. De situaties zijn
uitvergrote realismen, vermoed ik, meer speed, extremisme dan in het 'echte
leven', maar het blijft geloofwaardig. Dwangneurosen bestaan, zowel als
zieke kinderen met arme ouders, de kloof tussen arm en rijk,
homodiscriminatie en dierenmishandeling.
Het slot van de film vind ik dan wel wat voorspelbaar, maar hoe kon je je
het anders oplossen ? Het echte einde vind ik dan weer wel zowat een
hoogtepunt - ik zou er zelf niet opgekomen zijn; Carol binnen in de warmte
een koffiekoek aan het uitkiezen (in het licht dan nog wel), net voor
Melvin binnengaat (in het licht !) komt er een dienster buiten met een
vuilnisblik en hij maakt even plaats om haar door te laten... zבבבבlig
toch, zo'n symbolisch einde...                                . 
Even nog wat over film. Hij werd geregisseerd door James J. Brooks, die ook
de regisseur van de Simpsons is en de werktitel -vind ik altijd interessant
om te weten- was 'Old friends'. Scenaristen waren Mark Andrus & James L.
Brooks,  Hans Zimmer zorgde voor de muziek. In de VS kreeg de film het
label 'PG-13' (kinderen onder de 13 brengen best hun ouders mee) wegens het
taalgebruik, de thema's, enkele naaktscenes en een vechtpartij. De stemmers
van de IMDB (Internet Movie DataBase) gaven de film gemiddeld een 8.2 op
10, wat hem een 72ste plaats in de top 250 opleverde. Een opmerkzame kijker
zag dat aan het einde van de film de boodschap  "The actors in this film
were in no way mistreated" verscheen.
Jack Nicholson acteert al sinds 1958 - toen vertolkte hij Jimmy in 'The Cry
Baby Killer'. De rode draad doorheen zijn carriטre lijken wel de rollen van
slechterikken, die hij altijd toegeschreven krijgen - denk maar aan
'Batman', 'The Witches of Eastwick',... Komt dat door zijn uiterlijk ? Wil
hij het zelf zo omdat men (algemeen bekend, hier nog eens bevestigd door
Martijn van Turnhout) beweert dat 'boef, dief, schurk, psychopaat, sadist,
gierigaard of klootzak' de interessantste rollen zijn ? En Melvin is dat
allemaal wel zo'n beetje, Nicholson (als je hem niet echt kent) misschien
ook, hoewel ze voor part nog wat 'cru-er' kףnden - misschien zou dat de
film voor veel mensen dan wel verstoord hebben. Toch een erg-erg-erg
verdiende Oscar.
Helen Hunt acteert al sinds ze 10 jaar was en het zit blijkbaar in de
familie, want haar vader Gordon is regisseur. Het is dan ook niet verbazend
dat haar verloofde, Hank Azaria, acteert. In 1986 stapte ze over van tv
naar hoofdzakelijk films. Op tv is ze nu vooral te bewonderen in de rol van
Jamie in 'Mad about you' en ze was ook ייn van de hoofdrolspeelsters in de
kaskraker van 2 jaar geleden, Twister. Bij de Oscar-uitreiking was ze
dolgelukkig toen ze het beeldje in ontvangst nam, maar speechen ging haar
wat minder goed af; ze leek wat nerveus, leek wel tegen een onbepaalde
plaats op de muur te spreken en dat tegen zo'n tempo dat ze soms een paar
lange seconden stilte hield om 'op adem en woorden te komen'... 

Author
Timothy J Luoma
        I prefer to go to movies knowing as little as possible about what  
other people think of them, because it tends to influence me.  I knew nothing  
about As Good As It Gets besides its stars.
        Nicholson is the only man who could play this role (Melvin).  It was  
not surprising to hear that it was written mainly for him.  He carries it  
off marvelously.  As the obsessive-compulsive, Melvin continually shocks us  
with what he says and how he acts.
        It would be easy for Nicholson to ride roughshod over the film the  
way Melvin wants to ride over the world.  But Melvin has a weakness...  
namely, Helen Hunt (and a fine choice for a weakness she is ;-)  Hunt plays  
Carol, the waitress at Melvin's favorite restaurant.  She's the only one who  
can tolerate him, and the only one who can tame him, and even that doesn't  
always work. Hunt's character is a marvelous counter-balance to Nicholson's.   
That's no small task, and she does admirably in it.
        The supporting cast, especially Kinnear, is also good.  Even the dog  
is good, who seemed to be able to exhibit miraculous control over its  
bladder and whose eyes played a part in setting the stage and telling the  
story.
        The best part of the movie is the writing.  It avoids the  
stereotypes that would have killed the movie.  The pace was perfect, keeping  
the story going at just the right tempo.  What was (pleasantly) surprising  
was the ending, which I won't spoil, but will simply say that it skillfully  
done.  As we were leaving the theatre I heard someone else say they didn't  
want the movie to end.  I felt the same way.
        Brooks draws us into this world and we truly care about those who  
are in it.  As a romantic comedy this movie was perfect, avoiding the  
pitfalls gracefully, giving us a close-up of three people who could be living  
next door.
(All Rights Reserved.  No reproduction without permission.)

Author
Andreas Bach
Der verschrobene und дuяerst garstige Schriftsteller Melvin Udall (Jack
Nicholson) iяt jeden Tag im selben Restaurant, bringt sein eigenes Besteck
mit und nur eine Kellnerin, die alleinerziehende Mutter Carol (Helen Hunt),
ist bereit, ihn zu bedienen. Als Melvin wдhrend seiner ьblichen Tirade in
ein Fettnдpfchen tritt und sich ьber den schwer kranken Sohn von Carol
auslдяt, beginnt es in ihm zu dдmmern: die Menschen, mit denen er
tagtдglich zu tun hat, wie dem schwulen Maler Simon (Greg Kinnear) von
nebenan, scheinen ja doch ganz vertrдglich zu sein. Nach und nach muя
Melvin feststellen, daя er sich in Carol und den neuen Lebensstil verliebt
hat...
Es gibt eine Stelle im Film, da sagt Helen Hunt: "Warum kann ich nicht
einfach einen normalen Freund haben, einen, der nicht rumspinnt?", und
damit spricht sie dem Zuschauer aus der Seele. Denn der dьrfte sich nach
spдtestens einer Viertelstunde fragen, warum Regisseur und Co-Drehbuchautor
James L. Brooks nicht einfach "nur" eine normale Liebeskomцdie gemacht hat,
sondern den unmцglichen Versuch wagte, Drama, Komцdie und Romanze in 138
Minuten zu packen. "Besser geht's nicht" verheddert sich in umstдndliche
und vollkommen sinnlose Handlungsstrдnge, die den Film wie Kaugummi
hinziehen. Da wird kurz angerissen, daя der schwule Maler Simon so etwas
wie eine Managerin hat, die kurz im Krankenhaus auftaucht, um dann wieder
fьr den Film unwichtig zu werden, dort wird eine Handlung eingefдdelt, die
besagt, daя Simon eine Reise in die Stadt seiner Eltern unternehmen muя, um
sie um Geld zu bitten, die sich aber blцdsinnigerweise damit auflцst, daя
er am Zielort auf deren Anrufbeantworter spricht, und wieder zurьckfдhrt
mit Melvin und Carol. №berhaupt ist irgendwas schief gelaufen bei dem Film.
Er kommt und kommt nicht von der Stelle, hat keinen erkennbaren roten
Faden, und ist zudem noch schlampig synchronisiert worden, Jack Nicholsons
Mundbewegungen passen zu keiner Gelegenheit zu dem, was er (auf Deutsch)
sagt. Daя Wortwitz und Situationskomik auf der Strecke blieben, merkt man
den Dialogen stets an, als ob sich jemand mit der Hosentaschen-Edition vom
Langenscheidt hingesetzt und drauflos ьbersetzt hдtte. Die Schauspieler in
"Besser geht's nicht" leisten auch keinen allzu qualifizierten Beitrag ab,
um das Machwerk ertrдglicher zu machen. Helen Hunt spielt die Mutter mit
dem kranken Kind, Jack Nicholson den Fiesling, Greg Kinnear den Schwulen.
Das kranke Kind wird irgendwann nach der ersten Hдlfte geheilt und ist ab
sofort von der Bildflдche verschwunden, Nicholson ergeht sich im
Grimassenschneiden und exzentrisch wirken (macht sich aber nur
unglaubwьrdig), und Kinnear scheint der einzige zu sein, der seine Rolle
ausfьllen konnte. Wer sich ьber zwei Stunden diesem Dilemma aussetzen
mцchte, in dem man sogar meint, dem Zuschauer durch wiederholtes Einspielen
von Klaviermusik zeigen zu mьssen: "Jetzt wird es verdammt romantisch",
sollte sehr gutes Sitzfleisch mitbringen...
26/100 Sinn- und witzloses Herumgeplдnkel dreier Akteure in einem
Handlungsvakuum mit einem enttдuschenden Jack Nicholson

Author
Walter Frith
      Jack Nicholson has worked with director, writer and producer James L.
Brooks on 1983's 'Terms of Endearment' and 1987's 'Broadcast News' and while
Nicholson's career has been sagging a little since perhaps his most famous
role as the Joker in 1989's 'Batman', Nicholson is back in full form in 'As
Good As It Gets'.  Nominated for only one Oscar in the 90's for Best
Supporting Actor in 1992's 'A Few Good Men', Nicholson is certain to receive
a nomination for Best Actor for this movie.
     Nicholson plays a modern day writer in New York who is also a bigot who
suffers from obsessive compulsive disorder which forces him into routines so
radical, its memorable at every turn.  He spars with a gay neighbour (Greg
Kinnear) at every chance he gets and causes trouble with his loud mouth at a
restaurant he frequents involving a kind but independently minded waitress
(Helen Hunt) with a little boy.
     Under Nicholson's racist, sexist and homophobic skin is a man with a
streak of decency like Archie Bunker as Nicholson does nice things
eventually for the other characters in the film.  Kinnear is beaten and
robbed in his apartment and Nicholson takes care of his little dog in a
reluctant manner after the film's opening scene depicted Nicholson putting
the little canine down the garbage chute of his apartment floor's hallway.
     Kinnear travels to Baltimore to ask his parents for the money to pay
off his medical bills and Nicholson and Hunt go along for the ride and the
characters all change and contract a better and stronger moral fibre by the
end of the film.  The relationship that builds between Nicholson and Hunt is
the real focus of the film and the spark of romance between them is unusual
and unique.
     As is typical with a James L. Brooks movie, the tone of the film is
slightly off beat and non-conformist which is perfect and this is a great
date movie.  Brooks' interpretation of romance in the 90's is both
simplistic and touching and his style of presentation with this movie is
done with little music score while it lets the actors create their own
symphony of words and that's important.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Jeff Walters
        Is this movie as good as it gets this year? Well, no - I still
think Titanic and L.A. Confidential have this movie beat,
but damn this is one hell of a good flick. Much like the theme of a
Seinfeld episode this is a movie about nothing. Simply the story of
three people, how they react to each other and make it from one day to
the next.
               Jack Nicholson plays the compulsive
obsessive....er....obessive compulsive romance novelist, Melvin, who
is the 'King of the Put-down'. Let's face it, we all have come across
a Melvin type person in our lives. He's the kind of  person you spend
weeks bitching about after first meeting. That special kind of person
for whom you'd swerve   across four lanes of traffic just to get the
chance to run down. A real nice guy.
       Underneath the crusty exterior though is a kind man who simply
acts the way he does because he lacks the social skills to relate to
99.9% of society. One person in that slim 0.1% catergory who Melvin
finds intruiging is Christine (Helen Hunt) - a waitress in his
favourite local diner. The rest of the staff hates him and the boss
wants him banned, but Christine is able to see beneath the mask and
recognize Melvin for what he is......most of the  time. The third
person in this unlikely trio is gay artist, Simon (played by Greg
Kinear). 
        The acting is simply superb. It is a very rare thing when
other actors can keep up with Jack Nicholson in a movie,
 but in my opinion Hunt and Kinear both not only match his pace - but
even exceed him. Nicholson is still brilliant  though, I can't imagine
anyone else playing this role. It's just so him. Greg Kinear, who's
only other major role was in the recent re-make of Sabrina, exhibits
such character as the absolutely down and out artist who can't seem to
get a lucky break. Cuba Gooding Jr. is a lot of fun as Kinear's over
protective agent who makes Melvin cower at the slightest glare. His
effect on Nicholson is truly hilarious - turns the crusty old man into
jello at will.
       It is Hunt, however, who steals the show. A truly staggeringly
engaging performance in creating a character totaly unlike her Mad
About You, Jamie. If she had lost the Best Actress in the Oscars it
would have been an absolute crime. Being a Titanic fanatic (whoa, say
that three times) it's hard for me not to say Kate Winslet should get
it, but Helen Hunt is just too good. In her first real movie role (in
Twister she was buried behind the FX) she just blows  away all comers.
A very talented and passionate person. 
               The fourth main star in As Good As It Gets is the
script. The dialogue is original and witty - the jokes are all
thoughtful and clever, not just cheap jibes or obvious come-backs. The
 put-downs written for Melvin are instant classics - each is crafted
to completely deflate it's target. As someone who likes to stick it to
certain people myself - I had to love them ;) Don't think, though,
that this is a pure comedy - it's not. It is a powerful movie, with
moving moments and performances mixed together with a well-scripted
comedy.  Not a movie that's easy to place in any one genre.
       For me - the romance angle between Melvin and Christine doesn't
quitesit right. Nothing I can really put my finger on, but somehow
it's hard to picture the two characters together  romantically. 
               Anyway, if you haven't seen this movie - then I
strongly recommend doing so before it is banished to video. It's the
best comedy/drama of the past year and one of the best I've seen
period. 

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: James L. Brooks
Writers: Mark Andrus and James L. Brooks
Starring: Jack Nicholson, Helen Hunt, Greg Kinnear, Shirley Knight, Cuba
Gooding Jr, Skeet Ulrich, Jamie Kennedy, Yeardley Smith, Lupe Ontiveros,
Jesse James
I love Jack Nicholson.  It's not a sexual thing, but I just think he's
the most interesting actor to watch do his schtick, especially when he's
at his best.  When he goes off, and his eyebrows go all schizoid, it
somehow brings a giant grin to my face.  I mean, this guy's more fun to
describe than Steve Buscemi.  "As Good As It Gets" is, among other
things, a showcase for Nicholson's talents, getting the best performance
from him since 1992's "A Few Good Men," and reminding us how wonderful
and devilish this man can be.
Of course, it's also a poignant and interesting character study/comic
drama from James L. Brooks, who is a master of balancing the touching
with the hilarious.  The films he has directed (like "Terms of
Endearment" and "Brodcast News") and the TV shows he produces (like
"Cheers" and "The Simpsons") all have a way of being comical all while
being deeper than the usual piece of media.  "As Good As It Gets" is
also a reminder of how amazing Brooks is, while still managing to tell
an intriguing story centering on a trio of people who form emotional
bonds with one another over a short period of time.
The film's centerpiece is Melvin Uball (Nicholson), an
obsessive/compulsive neurotic nightmare.  He's a selfish, almost crazy
man who writes trashy and popular romance novels for women (when asked
by a female fan how he writes women so well, he rudely says "I take a
man.  Then I take away reason and accountability"...you saw the
previews).  He's a near agoraphobic, not letting anyone into his
expensive and spacious apartment, being almost as paranoid of other
people than Jerry Fletcher in "Conspiracy Theory."  He's also an intense
bigot - he's a racist, a snob, and a homophobe - and he shouts out
insults to anyone who pisses him off in the slightest.  This is a role
that if Jack had turned down, the entire film would have had to stop
production.
No one can tolerate Melvin, but one can take him in moderation.  At the
only restaurant he eats at, waitress Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt) is the
only one who serves him, not only because she's the only one who Melvin
lets serve him, but also because the other waitresses are deathly afraid
of the man.  A single mom, Carol suffers from being trapped in a bit of
motherhood with her asthma-ridden son, and also living with her mother
(Shirley Knight).  The two slowly begin to share a mutual relationship,
which slowly turns into unforced beginnings of love.
Also in his life, is his gay neighbor, Simon (Greg Kinnear), a painter
who is beaten up severely by thugs trying to rob his flat towards the
beginning.  The two share a very heated relationship which slowly begins
to develop into friendship.  He also owns the dog Melvin throws into a
garbage chute in the opening scene, which stays with Melvin for a couple
weeks while Simon's in the hospital for his wounds.  I just wanted to
say that I really liked how the film didn't exploit his homosexuality a
lot, and how it was only really brought up by slurs by Melvin.
The three characters drive the plot of the film, although we can already
see where it's heading.  We all know that by the end, Melvin will take
the first steps in becoming a "better person;" that Carol and Melvin
will begin a more...personal relationship; and that all three will be in
love with eachother, in one way or another.  But in 90% of films of all
time, you can see exactly what the ending will be from the first ten or
twenty minutes (or from the previews, these days).  It's just a question
of how it gets there.
And luckily, "As Good As It Gets" suceeds.  The film may seem a bit
forced at times, but it never overwhelms the feel or pace of the film. 
The characters never cease to be people, and we never stop caring about
them.  In most films, I could probably care less what happens to them if
the plot didn't make me think otherwise.  Here, James L. Brooks presents
us with three people who I was really caring about throughout, which is
shocking since one of them should get the "Archie Bunker" award for
hostility towards everybody who's not himself.
The lead actors also do an amazing job (and have all received
well-deserved Golden Globe nominations).  Kinnear gives his best
performance to date, showing that he's not just a cool, witty "Talk
Soup" guy (or a "Smile Like Yours" guy).  Hunt continues her tradition
of doing good acting jobs (she was even pretty okay in "Twister"), and
creates a beautifully layered human being.  This is Oscar-nomination
material here.
But Nicholson steals the film from everyone.  No big shock.  He is
saddled with a role that no one else can do the way he does.  The man is
hated from everyone, but he's the lead, and he needs to be likable to
the audience in order for people to care about him.  And Nicholson
doesn't fail.  He makes Melvin Udall a lovable sonofabitch, which is no
easy task, what with the dialogue he has to say at times.  He also makes
a human out of him, and gives one of the best performances of the year.
In smaller roles, Shirley Knight is awesome as Hunt's live-in mother,
and Cuba Gooding Jr rocks in a small cameo-esque role as an art dealer
who shows Simon's artwork.  Also, look for Yeardley Smith in a tiny
role, and "Scream" alumni Skeet Ulrich and Jamie Kennedy in the same
frame.
The writing is very well done, with lots of zingers, and classic
one-liners.  There are scenes that are so delicately written that I just
laughed hysterically, which I often don't do.  And also, a lot of it
actually sounds very human, which is always a nice touch.
Although it does have its flaws, "As Good As It Gets" is a very good
comic drama which can please a crowd without becoming all mushy or
distractingly funny, probably because it has delicate human touches to
it.  And my god, Nicholson's eyebrows...
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Ben Hoffman
Coincidentally, the film's title befits this reviewer's opinion of the
movie.   For sheer entertainment, for witty dialog, for fine acting,
it will be hard for any 1997 film to beat. Nicholson, in particular,
gives the performance of a lifetime as the mean-spirited romance
novelist, Melvin,  who would rather insult you than ignore you.   Not
giving the slightest relationship to whom you are, he enjoys
indiscriminately lashing out.
The first big laugh is when he tosses his next door neighbor's dog
into the trash chute found on each floor of the apartment house.   The
neighbor, Simon Nye (Greg Kinnear) happens to be an artist enjoying
much praise, which is reason number one (though no reason is needed)
for Melvin to attack.   Reason number two is that Simon is gay and
Melvin uses that as an excuse (again, not needed) to vent his spleen
on Simon.
The last of the film's triumvirate is Carol, (Helen Hunt) a single
mother with  an asthmatic child.    She is the waitress in the local
cafe where Melvin has his daily cholesterol-filled breakfast.   Her
small claim to fame is that she is the only one who fights back
against Melvin's sarcasm.
Melvin, as it happens, is not merely just mean; he actually suffers
from the medical problem of uncontrolled compulsive obsession.
Everything and everything is magnified by this illness.   Oddly
enough, the more Melvin lashes out at her and the more she retaliates,
a special relationship develops, each recognizing something good in
the other.    And so, while Melvin, Carol and Simon seem to share
nothing in common, their lives intertwine in this very funny and
touching not-to-be-missed film.
Smaller parts are handled nicely by Skeet Ulrich, Cuba Gooding, Jr.,
and Shirley Knight.
None of this, of course,  would have been possible without Mark
Andrus' excellent story and script, the latter in collaboration with
James  L.  Brooks.   Making intelligent, poignant adult dialog is not
easy but Andrus and Brooks have really poured it on in large
quantities so that it is a delight to listen to the actors say their
lines.

Author
Tim Voon
AS GOOD AS IT GETS is one of those brown packages that you get in the
mail that far exceeds all your expectations. Well written, sensitively
directed and wonderfully acted, makes this unusual romantic comedy one
of those rare treasures that one can look back on with utter delight.
Meet Simon the fag, Carol the waitress and Melvin the neurotic,
obsessive/compulsive, acid-tongued writer from hell. Mix these three
intriguing characters from very different walks in life together and the
result is an explosive experiment of human interactions. Watch the
neurotic writer (Jack Nicholson) spit hellfire on the fag (Greg Kinnear)
and waitress (Helen Hunt). Watch the fag get brutally beaten before
emerging triumphant, post emotional catharsis with renewed artistic
inspiration, thanks to the compassion of the waitress. Watch the
waitress struggle to bring up a sick child alone, waiter on the neurotic
writer before writing long thank-you letters where conscience becomes
the letter's most difficult issue. Then observe the neurotic demon
change into a guardian angel when he helps shelter the fag, the dog,
before falling in love with the most wonderful woman in the entire
world. This is life, and this is as good as it gets.
I've never liked Jack Nicholson as an actor or as a person. However, one
has to commend him on making his character Melvin, one of the most
ascorbic and entertaining characters to shine on screen. Greg Kinnear
uses his puppy-eyed look to effectively to draw sympathy from the
audience when he is savagely beaten. Lastly, the ever charming, ever
delightful Helen Hunt, whose character is similar to Jamie in MAD ABOUT
YOU, is ideal as the waitress who speaks her mind and holds her own.
Fine performances from all concerned. Making this movie experience one
of the most enjoyable this year.

Author
David N. Butterworth
Meet Melvin Udall, a misanthropic, racist, homophobic bigot with an intense
dislike of dogs.
Well, one dog in particular, perhaps--Verdell, a button-cute Brussels
Griffon from across the hall.  Melvin's had about all he's gonna take from
this pint-sized urinating machine and, in a scene we've all seen in the
three month's worth of previews, shoves him down the trash chute.  Given
that old stalwart "no animals were mistreated during the making of this
motion picture," Verdell shows up again a little rumpled--doggie dignity
included--but none the worse for wear.
This initial man vs. beast confrontation in "As Good As It Gets" does
little to endear Melvin to us.  After disposing of the furry little critter
this reclusive writer of romance novels holes himself up in his Manhattan
apartment (turning the lock five times very deliberately) and proceeds to
wash his hands in scalding water, wasting two entire bars of Neutrogena in
the process.
Melvin, you see, suffers from a chronic obsessive-compulsive disorder, and
it's not long before we witness further outrageous behaviors on his part:
Melvin insulting Jews, blacks, and Panamanians alike with vicious,
political incorrectness; Melvin twisting himself pretzel-like along a busy
street in order to avoid stepping on the cracks in the sidewalk.  And so on.
Later still we realize that Melvin isn't someone to be hated, however.
Misanthropy isn't a choice for him; it's a disease.
When Verdell's owner Simon is badly beaten during a robbery, Melvin is
"entrusted" with caring for the cow-eyed canine.  (Simon, a neighboring,
almost-successful artist is affectionately played by Greg Kinnear.)  During
Simon's convalescence, Verdell has an extraordinarily humanizing effect on
the antisocial author.
It's hard to imagine anyone but Jack Nicholson playing Melvin.  He's
terrific, in that Jack Nicholson kind of way, and is likely to garner an
Oscar nomination for his ebullient, eyebrow-centric performance.  Helen
Hunt plays Carol, a struggling single mother with an asthmatic son at home.
She's the only waitress in the coffee shop that Melvin frequents who can
stand him for more than a few minutes.  Hunt's puffy-cheeked nervous
fidgeting isn't much of an extension of her Jamie Buchman character on TV's
"Mad About You."
Things clunk, rather than click, between the two of them.
James L. Brooks, the successful producer of both big and small screen
projects--last year's "Jerry Maguire" and TV's "The Tracey Ullman Show" and
"The Simpsons" to name a few--has only a small list of directing credits.
Clearly he chooses his directing assignments carefully and clearly he likes
to employ Nicholson, who won an Academy Award for his supporting work in
"Terms of Endearment," and provided "Broadcast News" with a wonderful,
uncredited cameo.
As is typical with any Brooks production, the writing in "As Good As It
Gets" (by the director and Mark Andrus) has a depth that's rare by
Hollywood standards but, at 138 minutes, the film stumbles along and at
times seems contrived.  That Carol should settle for someone as
beyond-her-years as Melvin seems more a product of casting than it does
story construct.
That said, "As Good As It Gets" is decent, if not vintage, James L. Brooks,
made all the more palatable by that man Jack Nicholson.

Author
Chad Polenz
Chad'z rating: **1/2 (out of 4 = OK/average)
1997, PG-13, 138 minutes [2 hours, 18 minutes]
starring: Jack Nicholson (Melvin Udall), Helen Hunt (Carol Connelly), Greg
Kinnear (Simon Bishop), Cuba Gooding, Jr. (Frank Sachs); written by Mark
Andrus, James L. Brooks; produced by James L. Brooks, Bridget Johnson, Kristi
Zea; directed by James L. Brooks
Seen March 17, 1998 at 9:15 p.m. at Rotterdam Square Mall (Rotterdam, NY),
theater #4, by myself using my Sony/Loews critic's pass. [Theater rating:
**1/2: good picture and sound, poor seats]
        Stories and the process of telling stories are two completely different
things, and it a problem with modern drama is not lack of original ideas, but
original ways to tell stories. "As Good As It Gets" is a perfect example of
this, as it is a film with fresh ideas, but fails to assemble its pieces in a
suitable order. What we end up with is what should be an old fashioned feel-
good movie, but perhaps that's where the problem lies.
        What seems to be an on-going trend with major motion pictures is telling
stories of a protagonist whose mentality is different from the rest of the
world and thus we see things from a completely different perspective (i.e.
"Forrest Gump"). This film also uses that method, but does so in a daring way
by centering the story around an obsessive-compulsive cranky old man. 
        One of the basic rules of fiction is to make the main character likable, but
Melvin Udall (Nicholson) is as far from likable as one can get. He's
prejudice, paranoid, selfish, and mean-spirited, and yet he makes for an
original character due mostly to Nicholson's excellent performance. The
opening scenes quickly establish these traits as we watch him throw his
neighbor's irritating dog down his apartment building's trash shoot, and then
proceed to blame and verbally abuse the neighbor, a gay artist named Simon
(Kinnear), for the situation.
        The first act does a fine job in establishing the basic story elements and
plot lines that will crop up later when conflicts occur and thus provide for
theme. Many films follow this procedure, but here it seems just a little too
standard. Melvin's conflict with Simon is played more for comedy than drama,
and his confrontations with Simon's boyfriend Frank work in the same way, but
not only will these elements become more subtractive than additive, the use of
foreshadowing is a bit too blatant.
        In fact, the use of foreshadowing throughout the picture is one of the
biggest problems. Most dramas involve a romance in one way or another, and the
movies tell us that the more polarized the lead male and female characters
are, the more likely they are to get together. Of course this does happen
here, but the film seems to be in denial that this will happen. 
        Helen Hunt co-stars as Carol Connelly, a single mom living in a cramped
apartment with her mother and her son who suffers from a serious asthma and
allergy problem. She waits tables at Melvin's favorite restaurant and is
forced to put up with his constant bitching and snide remarks on a daily
basis. Since Melvin is so locked into a routine he can't stand to have anyone
else wait on him besides Carol, and when he learns she may have to quit her
job to take care of his son, he pays to have a specialized doctor take care of
him.
        It takes a while for this plot aspect to come into play, but the process is
at least entertaining and interesting, even if the thematic elements are
slightly sappy. Once Melvin pays for Carol's son's doctor they immediately go
from being just more than strangers to integral parts of each other's lives.
The tension between the two continues to build and it's hard to tell if they
genuinely like or hate each other. Meanwhile, a sub-plot crops up as Simon is
attacked, hospitalized, and loses all of his money. The dog who Melvin had
thrown in the trash is somehow placed in his care which will provide for some
development on behalf of his character, but not enough in the long run.
        A major portion of the film is spent building up separate plots and themes
which are only related through their connection to Melvin. The story is
slowly-paced and many individual scenes provide little more than gratuitous
comic relief (if it's possible for comedy to be gratuitous). This kind of
storytelling should provide ample room for character development, but only
scratches the surface. Nicholson's performance is terrific, but his delivery
still can't make up for the fact his character isn't given much definition
beyond the surface. We never learn what has made him become such a bitter old
man, or why he acts the way he does, especially since he isn't really happy (I
guess it's a chicken-and-the-egg scenario).
        Not until the final act does everything form a sense of cohesion, and
although it does give the film a definite sense of focus, it's not enough to
make up for two acts of a wandering script. Melvin, Carol, and Simon decide to
take a road trip together in an effort to save Simon's career. This in turn
makes for many scenes of interaction and discussion, but the scenes still fall
short of greatness. The tensions between the characters constantly build and
melodrama often dominates as they are either arguing or making amends. All the
subtleties that had come before suddenly aren't so subtle anymore, such as
when Melvin and Carol finally get together (and then break-up, and then get
together....) and Simon finds his artistic roots literally overnight. 
        The best way to sum up "As Good As It Gets" is by stating the obvious:
there's quality in the individual aspects, but by the end, nothing has
happened that could not have been predicted at the beginning from the way the
story was told.


Author
Heather Picker
Directed by James L. Brooks. Written by Brooks and Mark Andrus. Starring
Jack Nicholson, Helen Hunt, and Greg Kinnear, with Cuba Gooding, Jr. 1997, 139
min., Rated PG-13.
There were moments during "As Good As It Gets" during which I knew that
the film had the potential to live up to its title. Admittedly, the script is
among the most sharply written of the 1990s, and probably the best script of
1997. But the movie was longer than it should have been, and awkwardly overly
sentimental at times, among other things.
Melvin Udall (Jack Nicholson) is an obsessive-compulsive romance novelist
whose greatest character fault is his bigotry and abrasive personality, most
notably his tendency to become verbally abusive towards everyone with whom he
crosses paths. A crucial part of his routine is dining at the restaurant where
waitress Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt) serves him. He brings his own plastic
eating utensils, and is gruff towards other patrons, employees, and even Carol,
but he is also interested in her.
Carol has difficulties of her own, including the severe asthma that
plagues her young son, Spence. She is a single mother, raising Spence in an
apartment with her mother  Beverly (Shirley Knight), who is unhappy with
Carol's unhappiness. "As Good As It Gets" follows the progression of the
Melvin/Carol relationship, throwing into the mix Simon Bishop (Greg Kinnear),
an artist who lives in the apartment neighboring Melvin's.
Simon is gay, which Melvin makes a point of demeaning, and Simon has a
dog, Verdell, who Melvin makes a point of hating (and dumping down garbage
chutes). After walking in on a group of young men, the friends of a street
hustler (Skeet Ulrich) he has been painting, robbing him, Simon is severely
beaten. During his recuperation, Melvin is forced into caring for Verdell, at
the behest of Simon's protective art dealer (Cuba Gooding, Jr.). Man and man's
best friend bond, as will eventually Melvin and Simon.
As he begins to recover, Simon, emotionally and physically drained,
arrives at the conclusion that he should visit his parent's in an attempt to
mend fences with the father who has disowned him, and the mother who stands
idly by her husband, although she disagrees with him. Oh, yeah, Simon is also
going to ask them for money. Melvin is given the great distinction of serving
as chauffeur, and asks Carol to join the expedition. She accepts, partly
because she is intrigued by Melvin, and partly out of silent obligation. He is,
after all, paying for Spence to receive the medical care that Carol and her
mother could only dream of before. (He says he is doing it because he needs
Carol to be at work so she can cook for him.)
The road trip provides the chance for everyone to get to know each other
better, but by the time they're on their way back home, "As Good As It Gets"
has run out of steam. There is one ending too many, mainly the Melvin/Carol
resolutions that are basically re-treading previous encounters, you'll be
thinking to yourself "This seems awfully familiar," because the same things
have happened in different settings several times already.
James L. Brooks, who has directed such contemporary classics as "Terms of
Endearment" and "Broadcast News," has a style all his own that is easy to
recognize, and is in full-form here. The often-sparkling script, courtesy of
Mark Andrus and Brooks, is brought vividly to life in three of the best
performances of 1997. Nicholson is completely convincing as Melvin, and Hunt is
able to display the full range of her talents, which until recently were partly
showcased weekly as a mostly comedic actress on NBC's "Mad About You." If you
thought she was good in "Mad About You," wait till you see her in this. Greg
Kinnear, whom I best remember as the host of the hilarious cable show "Talk
Soup", gives a wonderfully nuanced turn as Simon. The supporting players,
including Cuba Gooding, Jr., Skeet Ulrich, Shirley Knight, and Yeardley Smith
(voice of Lisa on "The Simpsons") are all great.
"As Good As It Gets" is not as good as it gets, but is fitfully within
reach of being so. Nicholson and Hunt's Oscar-winning performances (Kinnear was
nominated for Supporting Actor) and an often daring and darkly comic script are
some of the better things "As Good As It Gets" has to offer, and the only real
disappointments are the repetitive incidents and anti-climactic ending (as was
the case in "Broadcast News").
Review Courtesy of http://www.thatmoviesite.8m.com

Author
Martijn van Turnhout
Als je aan een willekeurige acteur of actrice in Hollywood vraagt
wat de leukste rol is om te spelen, beantwoorden ze die vraag
met boef, dief, schurk, psychopaat, sadist, gierigaard of klootzak. Het is dus 
duidelijk dat de leukste rollen de gemeenste rollen zijn. En daar sluit Jack Nicholson 
zich helemaal bij aan. Na rollen als de duivel in "The Witches Of Eastwick" en de 
Joker in "Batman", is hij nu te zien in "As Good As It Gets". 
Melvin Udall (Jack Nicholson) is een schrijver, die alleen in een appartement woont. 
Door z'n dwangneuroses heeft hij veel nare gewoontes en hij is een echte mensenhater, 
wat vooral z'n homoseksuele buurman en schilder Simon Bishop (Greg Kinnear) merkt aan 
Udall's uiterst vervelende, discriminerende opmerkingen. Handelaar Frank Sachs (Cuba 
Gooding Jr.) staat Bishop tevergeefs bij in de strijd tegen deze sadist. 
Logisch dus dat Udall geen vrienden heeft, vandaar dat hij z'n vrije tijd vertoeft in 
een restaurant waar serveerster Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt) werkt. Connelly is het 
enige levende wezen op aarde waarmee hij kan opschieten. Totdat Udall een gemene 
opmerking maakt over Connelly's zoontje dat aan astma lijdt. Dat had hij beter niet 
kunnen doen, want vanaf dat moment wil zij niks meer met hem te maken hebben. Dat komt 
voor hem pijnlijk aan. 
Nu krijgt Udall het alleen nog maar moeilijker. Nadat Bishop in elkaar geslagen is 
door een inbreker, moet Udall op z'n hondje Verdell passen. Wonderbaarlijk genoeg gaat 
dat erg goed en hij raakt aan de kleine hond gewend. Helaas, na enige weken wil de 
inmiddels opgeknapte Bishop z'n hondje terug en als overmaat van ramp blijft Connelly 
vanwege haar zoontje thuis. Udall weet zich geen raad meer en besluit alle problemen 
uit de wereld te helpen, om zo z'n eigen leven weer op een rijtje te kunnen zetten. 
"As Good As It Gets" stijgt boven de gemiddelde comedy uit door de fantastische 
acteerprestaties. Van zo'n veteraan als Nicholson verwacht je alleen maar briljant 
acteerwerk en dat krijg je ook. Hunt speelt overtuigend een serveerster en Kinnear zet 
geloofwaardig de homoseksuele kunstenaar neer, zonder ook maar ייn keer te 
overdrijven. Oscars zijn niet onwaarschijnlijk. 
Aan het script is, in tegenstelling tot de meeste comedies, veel aandacht besteed. Het 
is goed uitgedacht, met realistische conflicten, karakterschetsen en vriendschappen. 
Samen met Mark Andrus zorgt James L. Brooks voor veel leuke dialogen en Udall komt 
helemaal tot z'n recht met z'n venijnige opmerkingen. 
Helaas kiest James L. Brooks voor een gemakzuchtig einde, zodat de film niet helemaal 
uit de verf komt. Niettemin is "As Good As It Gets" een absolute aanrader. Sterke 
acteerprestaties, het goede scenario en leuke one-liners zorgen voor veel kijkplezier. 
'Filmpje!' is located at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/8429/
where you can also subscribe to my mailing-list!
And you can find my film reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Martijn+van+Turnhout

Author
Dan Chodos
    "What if this is as good as it gets?", bellows Melvin Udall (Jack
Nicholson) midway through the film in a psychiatrist's waiting room. James
Brook's delightful new comedy answers that question with a firm "no, it gets
better Jack," and then takes us on a journey to prove it. There are three
central characters to "As Good As It Gets": Melvin the obsessive compulsive
but successful writer, Carol (Helen Hunt), the warm hearted, single mothered
waitress, and Simon (Greg Kinnear), the gay artist who lives next door. Each
have something to gain from one another and although their stories knock on
the door of clichesville it is entertaining none the less to watch.
    The film relies on Nicholson's natural screen charm to get us to
overlook his homophobia and racist reactions to the full illustrious city of
New York.. We're supposed to juicily bite into the fact that his bigotry
should be excused because he has obsessive compulsive disorder. In that
aspect "As Good As It Gets" insults its audience floundering in between a
serious character study of people OCD and a light hearted comedy. Take one
scene where Melvin obsessively washes his germs away using 3 bars of soap.
It's a painful scene to watch, sloppily giving the audience an excuse to
pity poor Melvin. It doesn't belong in this movie because there is no
justification for it. It's obvious from the get go that Brook's has trouble
layering the comedy he's aiming for with a character study the we deserve.
    The plot unfolds like a pyramid as Melvin attempts to reach for a higher
level of happiness in his life. Carol, the waitress at a local restaurant he
routinely eats in has a sick son with a very serious case of asthma. In an
almost desperate attempt to cling to the only person who will give him the
time of day, Melvin essentially buys Carol's affection in somewhat awkward
and seedy circumstances. We know from their first encounter on screen that
it's only a matter of time (in fact, too long) before Melvin and Carol get
romantically linked.
    But what stands out is the terrific performance by Kinnear as the
understated Simon. It seems as if Brooks doesn't even try to reach for
something and as a result comes a magnificent character developed from
simple storytelling. If he had only applied that same style to Melvin and
Carol, leaving out the unnecessary footnotes and relationship filler, we
would have fluency on the same level (although more serious) as Woody
Allen's "Annie Hall".
    While Nicholson's charm temporarily sways us from thinking about the
awkward moments, there are much deeper questions we want answered. Why after
so long does Melvin want to change? We want to believe that Melvin is a more
complex character than nasal-yet-funny phrases like "do you get me
sweetheart?" Unfortunately, Melvin and the film are funny, but laughter here
is only skin deep.

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
As Good As It Gets is the best American comedy of 1997, which may or may
not be a compliment.  The competition so far has been sparse, not to say
nonexistent.  In a movie season that has brought us Father's Day, Magoo,
Beautician and the Beast, two Joe Pesci comedies AND two Tim Allen
comedies, As Good As It Gets is, uh, well, as good as it gets.
At first glance, As Good As It Gets doesn't appear to be anything more
than a big-screen version of Seinfeld, with Simon (Greg Kinnear) playing
straight man to Jack Nicholson's Melvin Udall, the wacky neighbor.
(Kinnear's character is a gay artist, so maybe "straight man" isn't the
proper terminology, but you understand what I'm trying to say, right?
Good.)
Early on, Melvin shoves Simon's yappy little dog into a garbage chute.
Wackiness ensues when Simon ineffectually confronts Melvin.  Melvin
delivers an eloquent stream of mean-spirited insults to a mortified
Simon, and then slams the door.  Wacky, right?
But then...  we see Melvin lock the door. Then unlock it, then lock it
again, then unlock it, then lock it again... and then repeat the process
on the deadbolt lock.  One-two-three-four-five.  And then Melvin
retreats to the bathroom, opens a new cake of soap from his stash, and
washes his hands again and again.
As Good As It Gets is a comedy that dares to go beyond shallow,
stereotypical characterization and treat its characters as real,
three-dimensional human beings with problems.  On the surface, Melvin
Udall is a bitter, angry, sarcastic and bigoted bully -- but he's also a
man struggling with obsessive-compulsive disorder, trapped inside a set
of bizarre routines and fixations.
To its credit, As Good As It Gets is not a sappy disease-of-the-week TV
movie, either.  Although we understand the reason behind Melvin's
weirdly inappropriate behavior, Melvin is so creepy and twitchy that he
never comes off as sappy or tragic.  Melvin's OCD is played for laughs
throughout the movie, especially his terror of stepping on a crack in
the sidewalk.  (The set designers regularly confront Melvin with tiled
floors.)  Where a lesser movie might turn sentimental or weepy, As Good
As It Gets strikes right for the comic jugular and never lets go.
The part of Melvin was written for Jack Nicholson, and there's not
another actor alive who could have made the character believable and
charming.  He hasn't had a part this meaty since Batman, and he makes
the most of his opportunity.  Helen Hunt, as the waitress who is
alternately charmed and tormented by Melvin's antics, is superb, showing
a surprising amount of range and depth that wasn't present in Twister.
The script takes Hunt's character through the emotional wringer, but
she's always charming, always believable, and always compelling.  I
hadn't seen Greg Kinnear in anything other than TV's Talk Soup, and his
performance here is genuinely good. Although he's not in the same acting
weight class as Nicholson or Hunt, Kinnear is sympathetic without being
sappy, and manages to be sad and depressing without being pitiful and
annoying.  Cuba Gooding Jr. turns in a slick extended cameo as the most
kickass art dealer in Manhattan, and Yeardley Smith (of "The Simpsons")
has one painfully funny scene where she has to use notecards to brief
the injured Kinnear on his financial situation.
All honor and credit goes to director/producer James Brooks for this
fine movie.  Brooks is a voice crying in the creative wilderness that is
Hollywood.  He has consistently produced grown-up comedies with real
people dealing with real-life situations (Jerry Maguire, Broadcast News,
War of the Roses) while the rest of Hollywood relies on rubber-faced
antics and bathroom humor.  I encourage you to see this movie -- not
just because it's very good and very funny -- but because you'll be
casting your vote for quality entertainment and against the dreck that
gets passed around like leftover fruitcake this time of year.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
Your Guide to the Hollywood Stock Exchange
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Are you kidding?  No jury in the world would
convict a baby for murder.  Well, maybe Texas."

Author
Steve Kong
As Good As It Gets is a wonderful "feel good" movie. The wonderful part of
As Good As It Gets is that it is a "feel good" movie about a rotten guy.
Melvin (Jack Nicholson) is an obsessive-compulsive guy who whenever he
opens his mouth spews an insult. Melvin is an accomplished author, but
there's no helping this guy, is there? The thing that starts a chain of
events that changes Melvin is a cute scene stealing dog. Melvin is a
homophobic person, so he dislikes his neighbour, a gay painter, Simon (Greg
Kinnear). And when the film opens, Melvin (a very reclusive man) also hates
Simon's dog. But, after some things happen, Melvin is stuck with Simon's
dog, which starts the changing of Melvin. And Melvin starts to take
interest in Carol (Helen Hunt) the waitress at the restaurant where Melvin
eats all the time.
Jack Nicholson is just hilarious as the poison-tongued Melvin. Nicholson is
about to portray Melvin as a guy who just can't say something good, but we
can all see that he really does want to. Helen Hunt is also great as Carol,
the waitress who is really doesn't know what to do with Melvin. Carol seems
to understand Melvin and unlike others, she has a good temperance and is
patient with Melvin. Simon has his own troubles and we see how the Melvin
changes slowly and begins to accept Simon more. Greg Kinnear gives a good
performance as Simon. Worth mentioning is Cuba Gooding Jr. who is Frank,
Simon's art dealer, and watch for Gooding Jr.'s performance.
What surprised me a bit was the score for the film. The score comes from
Hans Zimmer, and it is, at least to me, something completely different from
what he's done before. The score is light but very likeable. It is
different from his other scores in that it isn't a pulse pounding score. It
is rather good and different from his last few scores which sounded the
same (The Peacemaker, The Rock, and Broken Arrow.)
As Good As It Gets is a bit long, but, it is entertaining enough not to put
anyone to sleep. The thing that drives As Good As It Gets is the
characters. The characters are well written and I just wanted to see what
they were going to do or say next. The story is somewhat predictable, but
that's OK, the characters are good enough to carry the film. As Good As It
Gets got me to laugh out loud quite a few times, and it was from
Nicholson's performance. He is the one to see the movie for. 

Author
Michael J. Legeros
     The new romantic comedy from James L. Brooks (BROADCAST NEWS, TERMS
OF ENDEARMENT) is a hoot.  Jack Nicholson sinks his fangs into yet
another role of a lifetime as Melvin, an obsessive-compulsive Manhattan
writer whose cranky, cursing, confrontational tendencies are in grave
danger of being humanized by three beings:  a struggling single mom
(Helen Hunt), a wounded gay artist (Greg Kinnear), and said artist's
small dog.  Politically incorrect hilarity ensues, but also a few tears,
as Mel can break a heart as quickly as he warms one.  In fact, the film
covers a range of emotions that's arguably *too* wide for it's own good.
The big (but not crippling) problem is the tone, which is susceptible to
the same split-second shifts that Nicholson's character is.  (Yeah, it's
fun to see him turn on a dime; it's another matter entirely when the
movie wants to.)  Then there's the story, which feels more than a little
contrived.  We're asked to believe a whole lot in this one, the least of
which is the grave age (and experiential) difference between Mel and his
love interest, well-played by Ms. Hunt.  How odd, I must say, to enjoy a
romance that has you rooting for the two to stay *apart*.  With Cuba
Gooding Jr., Shirley Knight, and Skeet Ulrich.  And, the song sung at
the piano by Jack is, indeed, Monty Python's "Always Look On The Bright
Side of Life."

Author
Jason Overbeck
Jack Nicholson gave one of his best performances in the James L. Brooks
masterpiece Terms Of Endearment.  Now almost 15-years later Nicholson is
back with Brooks in As Good As It Gets, a wonderful new film.  The
audience is so used to Jack's face that almost every time he raises an
eyebrow we erupt in laughter.
Nicholson plays Melvin an obsessive-compulsive writer of more than 60
successful romantic novels.  His next door neighbor is a gay artist
named Simon (Kinnear) who is financial trouble and has one cute dog. 
Nicholson eats every day at a restaurant and will only be served by
Karol a waitress with a chronically ill child.  
The acting in this film is great, but the brilliance of As Good As It
Gets lies in the writing.  This film is by co-written (and directed) by
James L. Brooks, a man that I cannot over-praise.  He has proven to be
one of the very best comedy writers alive.  This film's dialogue
sparkles and the main story maintains max quality while never falling to
sitcom shenanigans.
Many critics knocked the ending of this film, which maintains the fact
that As Good As It Gets is a romantic-comedy.  The entire film is unique
and uncompromising until the ending that is a bit of a let down.  It
almost has the feeling of studio handled end, that comes about after a
negative preview screening.  The ending doesn't stop the film from being
great but it does make it fall short of Brooks' 80s masterpieces.

Author
Kristian Lin
At one point in DECONSTRUCTING HARRY, Harry's wife, Joan (Kirstie Alley)
has discovered her husband's infidelity with one of her psychiatric
patients.  She screams at him until her anger is temporarily spent, and
now she's lying on the floor in tears.  That's when Harry says, "You're 
overreacting."  He's not being intentionally cruel; Allen gives the line
in his patented irritated defensive whine.  Harry's in denial, but Allen
lets us know that Harry's response is somehow worse than deliberately 
crushing her with the admission.  He's not only being dishonest with
himself and her, but he's causing her even more pain.  You feel like
cheering when she gets up and tries to strangle the little bastard.
Since HUSBANDS AND WIVES, Woody Allen has been in a new and frequently
startling phase of his career.  With his latest film, his take on the
relationship between art and life appears to have gone baroque. 
HUSBANDS AND WIVES had its obvious autobiographical elements, but
BULLETS OVER BROADWAY played the difference between being a great artist
and a great person to wonderful effect.  EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU
demonstrated the artificiality of movie musical conventions (while
paying them tribute) by using actors whose musical talents were, ahem,
closer to those of ordinary people than those of characters in
musicals.  DECONSTRUCTING HARRY, though, is like a hall of mirrors, with
auteur and characters constantly interacting.  Somewhere, Pirandello and
Borges are having a good laugh over this one.
Harry Block (Allen) is a lousy human being who's revered as a great
writer.  He's recognizable as the Woody Allen persona, but with all the
ugly sides in full bloom.  He cheats on his wives and girlfriends, likes
to be beaten by hookers, and treats the women in his life so abominably
that they wind up hating him.  Moreover, he puts their exploits into his
novels and short stories and thinly disguises their characters so
they'll all recognize themselves.  The movie's plot revolves around his
trip to upstate New York to receive an honorary degree from a college he
was expelled from as a student.  Lonely, he asks a hooker (Hazelle
Goodman) to accompany them, forgetting that he has already invited a
friend (Bob Balaban).  He then kidnaps his son from day care to see Dad
get his honor.
For the first time since ZELIG, Woody Allen has written a compelling
role for himself.  Through his writing, Harry gives pleasure to millions
of people as long as they stay the hell away from him.  But they only
hurt the people they're based on - his sister Doris (Caroline Aaron) who
married an Orthodox Jew, is painted as a harridan (Demi Moore) who 
insists on following the Torah to the letter.  His adulterous escapade
with his ex-wife's sister Jane (Judy Davis) is fodder for a farcical
story that breaks up Jane's marriage.  He repeatedly tells his
girlfriend Faye (Elisabeth Shue) not to fall in love with him, then he's
flabbergasted when she doesn't.  Instead she runs off with his best
friend (Billy Crystal), and Harry gets revenge by casting him in a story
as Satan.
The women in Harry's life are continually furious with him, for which
you can scarcely blame them.  Aaron, Davis, and Alley all have their
turns blowing up at him, and they're magnificent in their anger.  I 
realize that sounds like the villain in a melodrama ("My dear, you're
beautiful when you're angry,"), but it's true.  They're painful, but
Allen finds their raging, wounded outbursts funny, and he invites us to
do the same.  Sexist?  No, because these episodes would be sordid and
unfunny if Allen didn't also invite us to empathize with their pain. 
Davis is fantastic when she's overwrought, and at one point
hyperventilates until she passes out.  Alley's even better - her
crash-and-bang style of acting has never been put to better use than
here.
DECONSTRUCTING HARRY is purposely ragged, with plot digressions and
filmed fantasy sequences.  Some of these are just funny stories that
Woody Allen wants to show us.  It takes a while to realize that 
the movie's form cagily resembles that of a literary anthology or a
short story collection, like one Harry Block might have written.  The
movie ends in impressive fashion, as we see Harry being saluted by all
the characters he has created.  We can imagine Woody in some similarly
exalted state, surrounded by Annie Hall and Leonard Zelig and Cheech and
Linda Ash, and being serenaded by dancing Grouchos.  But Allen doesn't
end the film on this note.  Instead, the dream fades, and Harry Block is
left alone, pounding away at his typewriter.
I suspect that even if DECONSTRUCTING HARRY weren't around, AS GOOD AS
IT GETS would still feel like the piece of Hollywoodized fabrication
that it is.  Melvin Udall (Jack Nicholson), like Harry Block, is a great
writer and horrible person.  He's not only obsessive-compulsive, but he
spews racist, anti-Semitic, homophobic and misogynistic insults at
anyone in his path.  His salvation arrives at the hands of Carol
Connelly (Helen Hunt), a thoroughly winsome waitress without whom Melvin
can't eat at the restaurant where he has to dine.  It also comes from
Simon (Greg Kinnear), a gay neighbor whose career as an artist is
paralyzed when he's brutally attacked.
AS GOOD AS IT GETS is directed and co-written (with Mark Andrus) by
James L. Brooks, and Brooks is in his movie-length sitcom mode.  All the
characters are here to win you over, and the minor ones like Cuba
Gooding, Jr.'s art dealer and Shirley Knight as Carol's mother are there
to provide spurious dashes of color.  The movie's supposed to be about a
misanthrope who emerges from his shell, but it's apparent from the
beginning that Melvin's an old softie - 15 minutes in, he has gotten
attached to the little dog that he originally threw down the garbage
chute (yes, this movie will stoop low enough to use a cute little dog). 
We may think it's daring to make a romantic comedy about a guy who says
such horrible things, but Melvin's bigotry doesn't manifest itself in
any deeper way, which makes the shock value of his insults seem
calculated and cheap.
The casting, though, seems to be a deeper problem.  You can understand
why Nicholson's here.  He's always had this great ability to make an
audience understand his motives - we wouldn't have sympathized with
McMurphy's attempted murder of Nurse Ratched if he'd been played by
Pacino or De Niro or Beatty or any of Nicholson's other brilliant
contemporaries.  Brooks must have felt that he'd need all the famous 
Nicholson charm to counteract Melvin's sourness.  The problem is that
while Jack has the right attitude for delivering his outrageous
dialogue, he never finds the character's essence.  He was a plausible
man of letters in WOLF, but he's too busy investing all his energy into
getting in people's faces to give off the proper writerly aura.  If
Melvin had had Dustin Hoffman's less showy and more neurotic egomania,
it would have improved matters.  Regardless, Nicholson never settles
into the part, and he's left to fuss and leer his way through the
picture.  His problem spreads to Greg Kinnear, who looks uncomfortable
even before his character is thrown into physical and mental anguish.
Worse off is Hunt, that incredibly deft and irresistible comic actress. 
I've seen episodes of "Mad About You" that left me in awe of her skills,
but as a working-class single mother in a dead-end job, Hunt is too
perky, too young, too beautiful, and way too polished.  With her crisp
diction and appearance, I didn't believe her when Carol needed help
spelling the word "conscience."  The part needed Susan Sarandon's 
brainy middle-aged sensuality.  Or, if they wanted someone younger,
Minnie Driver or Anne Heche could have provided their brands of
unconventional beauty and keen wit while looking convincingly careworn. 
Michelle Pfeiffer would have brought the whole package.  As welcome as
it is to have Helen Hunt starring in a romantic comedy, she's wrong for
this part.
Woody Allen has taken criticism from some quarters for becoming morose
and isolated in his post-SHADOWS AND FOG years, but DECONSTRUCTING HARRY
still feels far more real than AS GOOD AS IT GETS.  Harry Block is a man
whose artistic flame burns everyone around him, and there's no 
redemption for him, even if he is a great writer (nor does Harry have
the saving grace of Melvin's mental illness).  Such a dedicated artist
may have a lighter side, but inevitably he's hell to deal with.  Of
course, it's possible to be a great artist and a semi-decent human
being, but when it comes to depicting this kind of person, we know we're
in the presence of the genuine article with Woody Allen.  AS GOOD AS IT
GETS is only Woody's vision domesticated and made safe for consumption
by sitcom audiences.  It gave me a good idea, though.  Maybe Jack
Nicholson should replace Paul Reiser on "Mad About You."  Instead of 
Paul's hypochondria, let's see how Jamie Buchman deals with a guy who
makes Jerry Seinfeld look like the world's biggest slob.  There's the
new cornerstone of Must See TV.

Author
Nicholas Amado
As Good As It Gets
Director: James L. Brooks
Starring: Jack Nicholson, Helen Hunt, Greg Kinnear, Cuba Gooding Jr.
Approx Running Time: 135 min.
In the film's opening scene, Melvin Udall (Nicholson) grabs a cute little
fuzzy dog who looks remarkably like an Ewok on all fours and tosses him down a
garbage chute. It was at this point I knew I would love this movie.
Not that I was happy to see the little guy suffer, mind you. As it turns out
the dog is fine and he remains throughout the rest of the film. He manages to
wiggle his way into your hearts too. But As Good As It Gets has so many things
that Hollywood films need these days. It has fantastic dialogue, lines you'll
be wanting to remember and use for years, extremely touching moments of
sentimentalism, and some brutal emotion. They all blend perfectly. 
The only negative I could possibly pin on As Good As It Gets is it's slight
edge toward being formulaic....but I won't. It is too good a film to do that.
Simon Udall is a fantastic character, a sort of modern Ebneezer Scrooge. But
he is more developed than Srooge ever has been. He is a successful romance
novelist who locks himself in his upscale NY appartment and writes constantly.
But his quirks are what make him so unique. He is obsessive compulsive. He is
also obnoxiously superstitious. But most importantly, he is one nasty, horrid
man. Somehow, though, we can't help but love him. Probably because his
nastiness is so witty and original. Nicholson was born to play this role, and
any other actor would probably have failed to do it with such heart. His
performance is as close to perfect as it gets.
Carol Connoly (Helen Hunt) is a waitress at a local restaurant, the only one
that Simon chooses to eat at, and she is the only one on the staff who will
wait on him. (He brings his own plastic knife and fork each time...you gotta
love him.) Hunt really gets a chance to shine in this film. She turns in a
marvelous performance because she hits all the marks. She hits every chord at
the right time, whether it is silencing a room with her grave sincerity in
anger, or crying, or being goofy. She does it all so well. Hunt surely
deserves numerous nominations for showing the world that she is more than a
sitcom actress. To be honest, as much of a Helen Hunt fan as I was going into
it, I am in love with her now. She needs to dump Paul Buchman and move to
Hollywood, become an actress.
Greg Kinnear has come a long way from Talk Soup too. He plays Simon's next
door neighbor, a gay artist who is badly beaten when he tries to stop a
robbery in his own appartment. Kinnear proves his worth as a top notch
performer here. He avoids the gay stereotypes that so many straight actors try
to include when they play homosexuals, and yet you see his sexuality at all
times. It is a very interesting and touching performance, mostly because he,
like Helen Hunt, can tell a joke one moment and errupt realistically into
violence or emotion the next. To say the very least, As Good As It Gets is
filled with memorable performances.
It is pretty easy to see where As Good As It Gets is going throughout. The
film turns into a sort of pep talk for being good people, but that doesn't
really matter. It is so funny, so emotional and so incredibly well acted that
you don't care about that formula stuff. You just want to see what happens
next. Absolutely one of this years best films.
(Point of interest: Brooks could not decide on a title. For a while, the best
he could settle on was "Old Friends". Apparently, the fact that there were no
old friends in the film bothered him. He also threw about "Rock Bottom" and
"The Bright Side Of Life" which is a song Simon repeatedly played on his
piano)
Four Stars

Author
Berge Garabedian
"Mr. Oscar", James L. Brooks (Three of the four films that he's
directed have been nominated for Best Picture, including this
e-TERMS OF ENDEARMENT (7.5/10) is the only one that won) 
directs Jack Nicholson to an Oscar for Best Performance by a 
leading male actor, Helen Hunt to an Oscar for Best Performance 
by a leading female actor, and Greg Kinnear to his first ever Oscar 
nomination for Best Supporting Actor.
PLOT:
This movie follows three very different people whose lives cross
because of circumstances, and change, because of emotions. Melvin
(Nicholson) is the overly-obnoxious and obsessively-compulsive writer.
Carol (Hunt) is the waitress whose status as a single mother further
accentuates her incapacity to take optimal care of her only son who
suffers from a severe asthmatic condition. And Simon (Kinnear) is the
semi-successful gay artist whose life turns for the worst after an
unpredictable and bizarre incident. Their sadness, pains, joys and
loves are the basis of this plot.
CRITIQUE:
Extremely well made character film which plays just as good as a
comedy, as it does an effective drama. This movie had me laughing out
loud on several occasions, while fighting back the lump in my throat
a couple of other pivotal scenes. Once again, director Brooks has
managed to effectively balance the two elements in this great picture
about love, the trials and tribulations of everyday life, and the human
capacity to survive and overcome all adversities.
The acting was top-notch all around, with Nicholson pulling off
another great performance as the rudest man in New York City, 
and Kinnear finally getting a chance to successfully showcase 
his acting chops to the world. Hunt was also very good, but I did feel 
as though she over-cried her part in one focal scene (Although she did 
make up for it in the scene where she demands that Melvin "never 
mention her son again" in the restaurant....ouch !!). The supporting 
cast was also very solid, with Gooding Jr. continuing to show us 
why he is definitely worth "the money".
And despite the fact that the movie did run a little long at close to
two and a half hours, the effective manner in which the characters
portrayed their lives was enough to genuinely keep me interested and
caring throughout the picture's entire run-time. The soundtrack was
also very good, as was the appropriate mix of sadness and humour
throughout the entire picture. One thing to keep in mind for this
film is that its content is definitely skewed towards a more mature and
adult audience. Somehow, I don't see your local skateboarding
GenX-ers appreciating the well-woven subtleties prescribed in this
wonderfully
human script. 
Little Known Facts: 
This film was originally titled OLD FRIENDS.
Screenwriter Shane Black plays the Café owner in this movie (He has
written LETHAL WEAPON (7.5/10), THE LAST BOYSCOUT (7.5/10), and THE
LONG KISS GOODNIGHT (7.5/10).
Director Harold Ramis (He directed the original VACATION (8/10)
movie, and GROUNDHOG'S DAY (7.5/10) plays Doctor Betts in this movie,
along with fellow director Laurence Kasdan (He directed BODY HEAT
(7.5/10) and THE BIG CHILL), who plays Nicholson's psychiatrist.
Some continuity errors in the film include: Melvin removing his
glasses twice while looking out of the window on a rainy evening, and
while in Baltimore, Simon ripping off his cast so that he can better 
draw Carol...but in later scenes, his cast being shown as intact.
Director James L. Brooks has also produced several successful TV
series including "The Simpsons", "Taxi", "Lou Grant", "Rhoda", and 
"The Mary Tyler Moore Show".

Author
Jason Bacon
Melvin Udall is a heartless man. He spends his days inside of his
spacious Manhattan apartment writing romance novels. It also seems that
Melvin will never change. One day he dines ar his favorite restaurant,
and is a little TOO mean to his normal waitress (the only waittress that
will serve him), Carol (played to perfection by a lovely and sexy Helen
Hunt.) She threatens not to serve him if he doesn't shut up about her
asthmatic son. he does shut up. To make matters considerably worse,
Melvin has Obsessive Compulsive Disorder.
 One day his gay artist neighbor Simon(Greg Kinear, of Talk Soup fame,
in an Oscar-worthy role)'s dog threatens to dismiss himself at Melvon's
door. The dog meets the garbage chute. Soon Simon is sadly beaten by
thieveing burglars, and Ray (Cuba Gooding, Jr.), Simon's agent, takes
the dog, Verdell, to Melvin, so that Melvin can dogsit him. And through
the dog and a rather heartwrenching car trip that involves Simon, Carol,
and  himself, Melvin learns  to emerge from his cantakerous shell. Jack
Nicholson gives yet another Oscar-caliber performance as the film's
cynical lead, and is back at work, not playing a goofy U.S. president or
a comic book villian, but instead playing Jack Nicjolson, and playing
him full force. All of this adds up to this year's funniest comedy, a
creative, witty, and scathing film from James L. Brooks, and Brooks gets
award-worthy performances from the entire cast. A winner in every
aspect, and a truly delicious slice of cyncial life.

Author
Edwin Jahiel
AS GOOD AS IT GETS ***1/4 . Directed by James L. Brooks. Written by Brooks
and Mark Andrus from a story by Andrus.   Photography, John Bailey.
Editing, Richard Marks. Production design, Bill Brzeski. Produced by James
L. Brooks, Kristi Zea and Bridget Johnson. Cast: Jack Nicholson, Helen
Hunt, Greg Kinnear, Cuba Gooding, Jr., Skeet Ulrich, Shirley Knight, et al.
.A TriStar release. 132 minutes . PG-13.
BREAKING NEWS: This movie has swept the Golden Globes Awards in the musical
or comedy category: Best picture. Best actor (Jack Nicholson). Best actress
(Helen Hunt)
Now playing, the shaggy dog film "Wag the Dog" is dogless. Also playing is
"As Good as It Gets" in which a real shaggy dog -- a rare Brussels
Griffon--steals scenes and becomes the agent of major changes. Its name is
Verdell, which I first took for "Fidel," which  made me expect a partly
political film, which it isn't. Fitting no pigeonhole category, it comes
closest to a socio-psychological comedy-drama.
"As Good" also stars Jack Nicholson, in top para-Satanic and aggressive
form, circumflex eyebrows, hooded eyes ranking with the best (Victor
Mature's, Bob Mitchum's), incongruous tan for a New Yorker (but no one yet
has ever been able to challenge the deep bronzing of Douglas Fairbanks, Sr)
and his bag of eccentricities at an apex.
The movie has both originality and well-crafted, deja-filmed mainstream
appeal. Peripherally, it is  a distant variant on Beauty and the Beast, the
Taming of the Shrew (with sexes reversed). Centrally, it is  a showcase for
the talents of Nicholson and Helen Hunt.
Melvin Udall (Nicholson) is a misanthropic, bilious, hypochondriac,
reclusive mega-nut. His manias include always washing with a fresh cake of
soap; walking to the same restaurant daily at 11 am for a giga-cholesterol
breakfast at "his" table served by "his" waitress; bringing his own plastic
knives and forks; wearing disposable surgical gloves; avoiding brushing
against people or stepping on sidewalk cracks. All of this, plus more
quirks, is apparently explained by his suffering from obsessive-compulsive
disorder.
That's bad enough, but Melvin is a pain in every other way too. He's a
champion people-insulter and, among other lovely traits, homophobic,
African-American-fearing, and a Jew-and-everybody-else Equal Opportunity
hater. This includes animals. The action begins with Mel (who probably
hates his parents for his name) throwing his neighbor's beloved pooch
Verdell down the laundry chute.
The neighbor, Simon (Kinnear) is a successful painter, whose art dealer
friend is a classy African-American named with originality Frank Sachs
(Gooding). Both are gay, but not that you could tell. The other major
"dramatis persona" is Carol (Hunt),  Mel's habitual, suffering, and
onlywaitress acceptable to Mel at the restaurant. She is a single mother
with a dangerously asthmatic boy, lives with him her mother (Knight) in
far-off Brooklyn, trudging to and fro exhausted by her waitressing and her
motherly duties.
When Simon is brutally beaten up by invading, thieving street hoods, and
taken to the hospital, Frank sticks Mel with the dog in a way that Mel
cannot refuse. Predictably, grudgingly (and unconvincingly), the writer and
the canine fall for each other. Did I say "writer"? Yes, that's what Mel
does for a living, composing romances for female readership and making lots
of money from his 62 or so purple-prose novels. The contrast between his
profession and his character is absurd, rates an F for credibility. Mel
explains his knowing portrayals of women by :"I think of a man, then I take
away reason and accountability." This adds gynecophobia to the list, makes
us think of Mel as a virgin (??!!) and simply won't wash.
Upon his return from the hospital, Simon finds himself broke: he has no
health insurance (a real tragedy for so many self-employed), his medical
bill is over $60,000, his art has been vandalized, his will to paint has
vanished, he is losing his apartment. But look what  animal companionship
can do for people! Increasingly human and humane Mel comes to the rescue.
And by some intricate plot devices, he also delivers Carol and her son from
the evil of uncaring doctors and medical bills. It's artificial plotting
but while you are watching it, it is also warm, lovely and well-acted. All
the while, of course, Mel is falling for Carol. But the New Mel dies hard.
When he introduces his friends to one another he says:" Carol the waitress.
Simon the fag." I'll stop here.
NIcholson, in spite of his improbable role, is Nicholson, meaning as good
as ever, even better perhaps. No surprise here. The real  revelation is
Helen Hunt. I have never cared much for her flimsy, parts in TV's "Mad
About You," and while she has many more credits, too many of them were in
unmemorable productions. She was finally top-listed in her previous film
"Twister" (1996), but her role was pallid.
Now finally Helen Hunt has come into her own.  Without bravura or pointedly
dramatic or humorous scenes and repartees, without prettifying makeup or
sexy clothes, without scene-stealing episodes, Hunt does steal the whole
movie. In one of the most amazing transformations in recent cinema, she
makes palpable her struggle with life and conditions, her exhaustion as
waitress, caring mom, commuter and debtor in splendidly veristic ways.
We learn nothing about the father of her child, or for that matter about
the earlier Carol, yet she is three-dimensional both in her sadness,
depression, lack of men in her life as well as in her moments of humor and
happiness. Cannily, the script adds rounding off Carol through a
funny-turning-unfunny interlude with a lover who vanishes.
Aged beyond her 34 years , not especially pretty by ordinary standards, she
is enormously likable, appealing, real and, yes, even sexy. She also
strikes very believably at HMOs and the medical profession, though the
"deus ex machina" introduction of a wise, wonderful doctor restores some
balance. Yet, what with Simon's lack of insurance, a strong case is made
against our health system.
Multiple Oscar-winning writer-director-producer Brooks had previously
directed "Terms of Endearment," "Broadcast News" and the notorious "I'll Do
Anything," which, filmed as a musical, failed in previews and had to come
out as a non-musical. Even so, the latter is my favorite Brooks movie,
partly because of its superb direction of actors. Now Brooks repeats his
tour-de-force with Helen Hunt. No matter how iffy the tale, the
performances make it a winner.

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     James L. Brooks has built a career being the executive producer on
some of the most popular TV situation comedies including "The Mary
Tyler Moore Show," "Rhoda," "Taxi," "The Tracy Ullman Show," and "The
Simpsons."  His touch is comedy with a strong dose of human character,
especially characters with foibles. His film-work has been more spotty
but includes TERMS OF ENDEARMENT and BROADCAST NEWS. His new film AS
GOOD AS IT GETS is more like his TV series than it is like his better
films.  In it he tells the story of a solitary misanthrope, a hermit
living in is big city, who finally discovers his humanity and finds joy
in relating to the very people he despised previously, not at all
unlike Ebenezer Scrooge.  The film's release around Christmas time only
exaggerates the parallels to Dickens's A CHRISTMAS CAROL.
     Melvin Udall (played with the usual gusto by Jack Nicholson) is a
boy-man who lives by himself in a New York City apartment building.
And by himself is just how he likes it since there is nothing he can
see that is very positive in his neighbors or anyone else for him to
care about.  He is finishing his 62nd book in a series of romance
novels whose popularity he ascribes to the fact that he actually
loathes women.  His hobby is candor raised to the level of a martial
art.  There is a firm mutual hatred between him and his apartment
neighbors, particularly Simon Bishop (Greg Kinnear of SABRINA), a gay
artist.  Simon's dog messes the hallway, and Melvin wants to see the
little dog destroyed.  Melvin's favorite person in the world (meaning
he has only a mild dislike for her) is Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt of
TWISTER) the waitress who serves him at a local restaurant.
Circumstances--with a strong assist from Simon's professional manager
(Cuba Gooding, Jr.)--force Melvin to take Simon's dog into his
apartment and care for him.  In spite of all his worst instincts,
Melvin finds himself actually liking the dog and this opens a chink in
his shell that allows him to start relating to both Simon and Carol.
What follows one of the last act of A CHRISTMAS CAROL played in slow
motion.  Melvin also takes an interest in medical care for Carol's
sickly (dare I say "Tiny- Tim-like") child.
     The film itself is sporadically funny and occasionally touching,
but offers little that is not available on TV. One difference between
this film and a TV comedy is the shock value of Nicholson's comments
and insults. Melvin goes well beyond the limits of Archie Bunker or
even of the Simpsons making obscene suggestions about Simon's sex life.
One can do that in a movie and not face TV censorship, I guess, but
they do little to improve the viewing experience.
     Beyond the go-for-the-throat comments, Brooks has done here little
that he could not have done on the set of a situation comedy.
Certainly this is a story told on a smaller scale than his TERMS OF
ENDEARMENT or BROADCAST NEWS.  The script, which Brooks co-authored
with Mark Andrus is funny only on a hit and miss basis.  Perhaps part
of the problem is that once it is established what a creep our main
character is, the audience has less emotional investment in seeing him
rewarded with a happy ending.  One is torn between whether the best
ending has him finding happiness or being hit by a truck.
     This is certainly one of Brooks's more minor contributions to
American entertainment.  The film is watchable, but tepid.  I rate it a
6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Dennis Schwartz

AS GOOD AS IT GETS (director: James L. Brooks; cast: Jack Nicholson
(Melvin Udall), Helen Hunt (Carol Connelly), Greg Kinnear (Simon
Bishop), Cuba Gooding Jr. (Frank Sachs), 1997)
 AS GOOD AS IT GETS is a formula driven sitcom, with nothing new added
in the way of being fresh stuff, except from the charms emanating from
its characters, with the film relying mainly on the comic antics of Jack
Nicholson (Melvin Udall) to carry the ball, as an obnoxious curmudgeon,
who plays this successful and wealthy writer who at one time was under
private therapy treatment for an obsessive/compulsive disorder, which
explains his wearing of gloves indoors and outdoors, eating at
restaurants only with plastic utensils, and his not stepping on the
cracks of a sidewalk (I do the same thing and no one diagnosed me with
that pychological problem; but, come to think of it, with me its more of
a thing about it being bad luck to step on a crack). When I was taking
college courses in psychology, which is quite awhile ago, I learned that
this kind of disorder didn't have to lead to such ill-mannered behavior
as Melvin displays.Which is why Melvin's character is more probably a
combination of such obsessive/compulsive behavior and a case of rude
manners. In other words, he is a turd.
Well, Nicholson was real funny doing this compulsive schtick that
borders on his just being a turd most of the time, but at his edgiest
moments, when he crosses the line of common decency and reaches a point
where the audience might not like him anymore, he brought the most
laughter to the screen. But you could just bet your honest-to-God
paycheck, that when he threw that little dog of his gay next door
neighbor, the artist Simon (Greg), down his Greenwich Village apartment
garbage chute in the opening scene, his character was going to be
redeemed by the end of the film.
This "feel good" sitcom looking film, goes on and on for a sometimes
hilarious but too often obnoxious two hour and more, as if this was an
important film with so much to say, that it couldn't leave out a scene
or two or three, as it manipulated some twists and turns into the story
line and managed to show Melvin at his bigoted worst and then at his
most generous best. If you believe such readily made reversals, then you
are a better man than me, Gunga Din. With Simon, he would go into his
fag joke routine, and with the only waitress, Carol (Hunt), who would
serve him in his favorite restaurant, where he was a long time diner,
but where he was, nevertheless, disliked by everyone there, including
the owner, he would poke personal insults at her.That is pretty much the
story line.
If you believe Melvin has changed or if anything is supposed to happen
that is for the better in his character, then I guess you believe
something I didn't, or couldn't, or rather, I didn't care if  I believed
it or not, since I sauced it out, real pronto, within the first five
minutes of this flick, that the story didn't matter much, this was a
cosmetic psychological rendering to a situation that could be real, but
that this film was not about real internal changes, but about creating a
slickness about its characterizations of people so the audience could
have enough laughs at Melvin's insensitivity to others and be diverted
by that, and walk out of the theater happy to believe that Melvin wasn't
so bad a guy after all.
What saves this film from itself, is that because the actors are so
good, this film is actually a hoot in many different ways besides its
great one-liners. The actors are really into their roles, getting down
pat the minutia of their characters. Carol, the single parent living
with her mother in Brooklyn, wears house dresses middle-aged apartment
dwellers there might appreciate, as she walks like she came out of the
hospital, which, in fact, is what she does mostly in the film, a captive
of her son's poorly treated asthma attacks. Melvin walks like he's a bit
daffy. I love'd that slide step he had, something like Jackie Gleason
did on the "Honeymooners" TV show. His outfits were a bland middle-aged
man's delight. He'd fit in on any cruise liner. Simon walks like he's
the sensitive homosexual artist he is supposed to be. Cuba Gooding Jr.
plays Frank, the gay art dealer and friend of Simon. He walks as if he
is wearing high heels to a Grenwich Village Halloween party.
After a few scenes of introducing Melvin as a turd, the film changes
direction when Simon is severely beaten up by robbers and he is forced
to come down from his high horse of being so proud of who he thinks he
is, and gets Melvin to watch the dog he recovered after Melvin threw it
down the chute.The film now proudly states, look at how Melvin has
improved since he has fallen in love with man's best friend, a dog. By
walking the dog around town and bringing it to the restaurant, he begins
to make Carol think that he is almost human. When Carol quits her job to
be nearer her sick son, the distraught Melvin can't get along without
her serving him in the restaurant, so he does the unthinkable, without
informing Carol he pays for a top-notch doctor for her son, who is able
to cure the kid and make Carol eternally grateful to him, but she goes
out of her way to make it clear to him that she never intends to sleep
with him, even though he has never even hinted at that.
The remainder of the film is predictable and pretty much made up of
contrived sitcom stuff. The only purpose of following the story from
here on in, is to get to hear some of the one-liners, that break-up the
tedium of the plot, as Melvin is in love with Carol, and has a chance of
scoring, even though she told him never. So what does the schlimazel do,
he screws it up by saying the worst thing he can possibly say to her. He
even refuses to dance with her, which I found to be a truly funny moment
in the film.But the film couldn't take a chance of sticking to this
unsafe type of humor and went back to its safer plot. And the plot keys
in on how Melvin is reforming for Carol, as it goes back and forth, good
Melvin, bad Melvin, unsure of how rotten or nice a guy they want to make
Melvin out to be by the film's end. I wonder how many screening polls
they must have had, before they came up with the right box office
formula for success.
In any case, some of my favorite lines in this flick were, Simon to
Melvin, "The best thing you have going for you, is your willingness to
humiliate yourself." Carol to Melvin, "Come in and try not to ruin
everything, by being you."
How good it couldn't be, at least, has a lot of funny moments to show
for its efforts... I must say, I thought Helen Hunt looked a lot like
Meryl Streep. Now that's a compliment, Helen.
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Seth Bookey
It is very difficult to not love anything directed by James L. Brooks
(*Broadcast News*, *The Simpsons*, *The Tracey Ullmann Show*), and it is
very difficult not to love what one friend calls "vintage Nicholson," so
it is very difficult to not like *As Good As It Gets*. And what's not to
like.  It's funny, it's got a cute little pug dog, it's got a gay
neighbor. Hey, it's got Helen Hunt. Why are you reading this review? Rush
out and see this movie now!
Of course, with all this going for it, it's easy to overlook the
improbability of the storyline and the unlikeliness of it all. 
Sold entirely on the strength of Jack Nicholson's reputation (which
suffered under recent nonsense like *Wolf*), it is greatly augmented by
great performances by Hunt, Greg Kinnear, Cuba Gooding Jr., and their
little dog, too. The dialogue is very lively and often hilarious. Now,
onto the requisite description of the situation comedy presented here. 
Melvin Udall (Nicholson) is a bigot who has a nasty comment for anyone and
everyone he meets--strangers, neighbors, and people he knows. He surely
has no friends. He also has obsessive-compulsive disorder and
hypochondria, which is played for laughs here, and which disappears as
needed to propel the story along. Melvin is a creature of habit; he never
steps on a crack, he uses a new bar of soap every time he washes his
hands, and he eats lunch at the same restaurant, at the same table, served
by the same waitress, Carol (Hunt).
Melvin's life is turned upside down when his gay neighbor Simon (Kinnear) 
is robbed and beaten, and Frank (Gooding) forces him to care for Simon's
beloved little dog. Also upsetting the apple cart is the absence of Carol
from her waitress station when her asthmatic son gets sick. This forces
Melvin to reconfigure his OCD and prejudices so he can try to restore
them. 
What follows is the very unlikely road trip to Baltimore (from New York) so
Simon can have some sort of reconciliation with his homophobic parents,
which is sidelined by the budding romance of Carol and Melvin. 
Does it matter that this couldn't possibly ever happen? No. Melvin is a
90s Archie Bunker, the bigot you hate to love, but you do anyway. The
movie is very well written and has many funny moments, however
unrealistic. For example, how does a waitress afford  a multiroom
apartment in an historic district in Brooklyn. 
Especially noteworthy: Shirley Knight as Beverly, Carol's mother, and the
scene in which the movie's title is uttered.
Written by Mark Andrus and James L. Brooks. 

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Marty Mapes
**1/2 (out of 4) Other people will tell you what's good about AS GOOD AS
IT GETS. They are not wrong, but too many people are putting this flawed
movie on their "ten best" lists, and I think a contrasting point of view
is deserved. 
The dialogue written for Jack Nicholson and Helen Hunt by Mark Andrus
and Brooks is funny and fresh. Nicholson is great as Melvin, the cross
between Archie Bunker, Ebenezer Scrooge, and WHAT ABOUT BOB. Hunt is
very good as Carol the waitress, who endures Melvin when nobody else
will. Greg Kinnear is alright as Simon, Melvin's gay artist neighbor
whose little doggy is a source of friction between them. 
When Simon is hospitalized from a serious beating, Melvin is "suckered
in, set up, pushed around" into watching Simon's dog for him. The story
shows Melvin's slow and gradual redemption, starting with his affection
for the little dog. 
Melvin shows real progress toward becoming a likeable human being,
developing friendships both with Carol and with Simon, but the movie
runs into problems toward the end. 
The first sign of trouble comes when, after being paid the nicest
compliment of her life, Carol can't forgive Melvin a relatively small
slip of the tongue, even though she knows of his psychological handicap.
She storms out of the restaurant and into the arms of Simon. Simon SEEMS
to pose no sexual competition to Melvin, but his sensitivity proves
enough to satisfy Carol's needs. Carol and Simon realize they have
something good without Melvin. 
If that scene is as true as it plays, then the movie should logically
end as a tragedy for our main character Melvin. But because the genre is
romantic comedy, things have to work out for Melvin, and that makes the
previous scene a manipulative lie. 
What happens next is entirely too much will-they-or-won't-they. Since
the movie didn't end after Carol and Simon's night together, we know
that all the "tension" is a false attempt to pull on our heartstrings
one more time before the movie ends. It was a real disappointment after
an otherwise good movie. 
Perhaps another way to summarize what's wrong with AS GOOD AS IT GETS is
to say that the movie treats its female lead as an object. Melvin has
spent the entire movie proving himself worthy of Carol's affections, and
she has even come to accept them, fully knowing his flaws. But because
the writers need to drag the story out another 20 minutes, they have
Carol reject Melvin once or twice. She is not acting as a human being,
she is acting as the fickle object of Melvin's affections, serving the
purposes of her writers, not of herself. 
AS GOOD AS IT GETS reminds me of last year's JERRY MAGUIRE. Both are
heartwarming comedies about redemption, both are widely praised by
critics, but deep down, both are shallow and give too little freedom to
their characters, at the expense of manipulative, manufactured love
stories. 
This movie was a nice try: not quite perfect, but with lots of redeeming
qualities. Ordinarily I would recommend such a movie, but because this
movie has already gotten lots of praise - too much, in fact - I cannot.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Christopher Null
     Some of the most memorable one-liners of the year, Jack Nicholson's best
role since CHINATOWN, Greg Kinnear's best role since... well, since ever, and
a story I think we can all relate to  what does AS GOOD AS IT GETS *not* have?
     Aside from a few quibbles, AS GOOD AS IT GETS really stands out as one of
the year's best films.  Mark Nicholson down for a well-deserved Oscar.  In
fact, just watching him do two hours of his irredeemable Melvin by himself
would be a treat.  Match him up with a fine supporting cast, and it's golden.
     The story doesn't really lend itself to explanation, but I'll try anyway.
 Melvin is a famous novelist, as eccentric and neurotic as they come. 
Obsessed with ritual, leaving the house is an ordeal.  Hell, opening the door
is an ordeal.  But when tragedy befalls his gay artist neighbor (Kinnear),
Melvin rises to the task and finds himself on a bit of a personal journey, to
risk sounding sentimental.
     Along for the ride is Helen Hunt's Carol, the waitress with whom Melvin
is quietly smitten.  And though the three seem as far off from one another as
they come, they actually have one thing in common:  they're all plain nuts. 
And it doesn't sound like it, but the way these three help each other through
bad times makes for some powerful and quite hilarious cinema.
     For what it's worth, Hunt is in fine form, redeeming herself for her
now-hateful character on TV's `Mad About You,' and maybe it was watching
Nicholson here that made her that way.  My only real complaint is that, while
it's a fun ride, the movie is a bit circuitous, and after two hours, I'm not
sure I buy the resolution.
     But it doesn't really matter.  AS GOOD AS IT GETS finally tells it like
it is:  most of us are nuts.  In fact, most of us are completely fucking nuts!
 And if you look hard enough, there really may be someone out there for all of
us, to help us make some sense of this wild ride we're on after all.
Director: James L. Brooks
Producer: James L. Brooks, Bridget Johnson, John D. Schofield, Kristi Zea
Writer: Mark Andrus, James L. Brooks
Starring: Jack Nicholson, Helen Hunt, Gg Kinnear
http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/asgoodasitgets/
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
David Wilcock
James L. Brooks, one of the developers of The Simpsons and director of
Broadcast News, returns to the big screen with this entertaining, if
slightly flawed comedy. Nicholson plays Melvin Udall, probably the
most horrible person ever on the screen. He's racist, homophobic, and
never has a good word to say to anyone. So, nobody talks to him,
except waitress Carol Conelly (T.V sitcom star Hunt, who was last seen
in Twister, 1996).  Naturally, Udall, Conelly and gay neighbor Simon
Bishop (Kinnear) who Nicholson hates, all hit it off in the end.
Like Good Will Hunting (1997) and Titanic (1997), even though the
outcome is completely obvious, As Good As It Gets is an enjoyable,
funny and warm comedy. Nicholson is hilarious as Melvin, churning out
insults with superb relish. Only Nicholson could get away with the
lines that Melvin delivers. Hunt is also good as waitress Carol, and
easily rises to the challenge of Nicholson. There's also (thankfully)
a bit of chemistry between them.  Kinnear, as the gay neighbor, seems
to have a slightly underwritten role, he's more of a plot convience
than a character. Although his performance is good, his character just
seems to exist to help Melvin and Carol come together. In fact, the
scene stealer is Simon's dog, who is funnier than Nicholson. But then
again, pets are always cute on screen.
Providing solid support is Cuba Gooding, Jnr (Jerry Maguire, 1996) and
Yeardly Smith (who is the voice of Lisa Simpsons in The Simpsons)
Although Gooding isn't as good as is character in Maguire, he is still
fun. He overacts a little, but not so much as to be annoying. Smith is
also good, although she has a fairly small role.  Even director
Lawrence Kasdan (Body Heat, 1981) makes an appearance as a doctor.
But this is primarily Nicholsons film, and every scene he's in, he's
steals it. He's character is so hateful, though, it's amazing that
anyone talks to him at all, especially Carol. And this is the films
main problem. It's totally unbelievable that Carol would ever consider
liking Melvin. She doesn't fall in love with him naturally, the film
forces her to fall in love with him. Also, Melvins character seems to
go too nice, too quickly. I would doubt anyone with a character like
Melvins would be able to turn back to a nice, loving person. It would
take a helluva long time, much longer than this film would like to
make out. Brooks direction is good, though, if a bit average, but he
usually manages to get an emotion out of the audience. He handles the
comedy scenes better than the sentimental ones (he tends to pile on to
much schmaltz) but generally he's good. There's also a nice soundtrack
by veteran composer Hans Zimmer.
But, generally, As Good As It Gets achieves what it sets out to do,
which is to make the audience feel good by the end of the movie. The
movie is a bit overlong, but Nicholson is such good fun that the
running time passes by pretty quickly. Overall, As Good As It Gets is
a fun movie, even though it may be unbelivable, and certainly worth
seeing (if just for Jack Nicholsons performance.) Not quite As Good As
It Gets (pardon the bad joke), but still good fun.

Author
D Lewis
(For your consideration -- the following review of "As Good As It Gets" that
I wrote for the Dec. 97-Jan. 98 issue of _Out & About North Florida_, a
publication of the Lesbian and Gay Community Association of Jacksonville. The
issue was printed on Dec. 19.)
OK, guys, if you've had a crush on Greg Kinnear ever since his days as
host of "Talk Soup," you're in for a real treat this Christmas.
Kinnear plays gay artist Simon Bishop in the movie "As Good As It Gets,"
which opens Dec. 25 at theaters in Jacksonville and elsewhere.
Simon is a painter whose Manhattan apartment/studio is across the hall
from the apartment of Melvin Udall (Jack Nicholson). Melvin is a self-
centered, opinionated, obsessive-compulsive author.
To describe Melvin's comments as "politically incorrect" is an
understatement. His thoughtless remarks have managed to alienate almost every
customer and employee of the neighborhood cafe he visits for breakfast each
morning.
Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt) is the only waitress who's willing to
overlook Melvin's idiosyncrasies. Therefore, she becomes the stabilizing
figure in the neurotic Melvin's morning breakfast ritual.
Melvin's neighbors aren't sure of how to perceive him and, at first, the
audience may not be, either.
Often Nicholson uses facial expressions that seem like a throwback to
his portrayal of another author, Jack Torrance, in 1980's "The Shining." If
this movie hadn't been advertised as a comedy, audiences probably would expect
Melvin to start breaking down d oors with an ax.
Melvin uses non-PC dialogue when referring to Simon, but we soon learn
that he's not a homophobe. Melvin makes comments that are just as impolite to
a couple he perceives as Jewish who are sitting at his usual table in the
restaurant. But by then the audience knows that Melvin isn't a bigot, he's
just upset at encountering a change in his breakfast ritual.
The director, James L. Brooks, uses Melvin's obsessive-compulsive
disorder to bring in dialogue that studios would have been too nervous to
permit just a few years ago.
We may wince at many of the comments Melvin makes to Simon. And
socially conscious straights (and gays) may feel a twinge of guilt as they
chuckle at those lines. Yet it's clear that there's no hatred behind any of
Melvin's remarks.
Kinnear plays Simon with admirable restraint. Kinnear's mannerisms
border on excess flamboyance in the opening scene in which Simon welcomes home
his lost dog (the pooch Melvin sent down a garbage chute). But once Kinnear
settles into the role, Simon comes across as the average gay man (i.e., as
unobtrusive as any other man on the street).
Yes, Simon is one of filmdom's "gay guys even a Southern Baptist
could love." Like George Downes (Rupert Everett) in "My Best Friend's
Wedding," Simon helps a straight couple sort out their feelings for each
other. But unlike Kevin Kline in "In & Out," he doesn't get to kiss Tom
Selleck.
Now that Ellen Degeneres has shaken the taboo of being "out" on screen,
writers of romantic comedies have embraced the gay male character who can
serve as the lead female's confidant while not posing a threat to the male
lead.
Should we be upset that there isn't a romance for Simon in "As Good As It
Gets?" Well, the actor who would have been chosen for an on-screen kiss with
Kinnear has reason to be riled. But Kinnear's character is a groundbreaking
role in another area -- a gay man who could be spokesman for the "True Love
Waits" movement.
Vincent (Skeet Ulrich), the street hustler Simon invites in to model for
his next project, is certainly surprised that modeling is all Simon has in
mind.  And gays may think it is just *too convenient* that the script has made
Simon a single guy still waiting for the right man to come along.
But later in the movie, when Simon reminds Melvin of how fortunate any man
would be to meet the one other individual he wants to be with the majority of
time, we realize that Simon hasn't abandoned a goal many of us have discarded.
The publicity campaign for "As Good As It Gets" began three months ago,
possibly because Tri-Star Pictures realized a character with the disposition
of Melvin Udall might not make an ideal first impression with an audience.
When I first saw the preview and the scene that shows Melvin sending
Simon's dog down the garbage chute, I thought, "No way am I going to pay $6 to
see this." But my opinion of the movie began to change the more I saw the
preview.
There was a charm in the scene showing Jack Nicholson and Helen Hunt in a
restaurant on Chesapeake Bay while "I Love You For Sentimental Reasons" plays
in the background. (Ironically, despite the allure of that scene in the
preview, the song isn't featured at that point in the actual movie. And the
preview itself contains a longer snippet of the song than is actually used in
the film.)
The only connection between the Christmas season and "As Good As It Gets"
is the movie's Dec. 25 release date. But this movie, with its themes of true
love and true friendship, is perfect for the holiday.
                     "As Good As It Gets"
Cast:
Jack Nicholson..........................Melvin Udall
Helen Hunt..............................Carol Connelly
Greg Kinnear............................Simon Bishop
Cuba Gooding Jr.........................Frank Sachs
Skeet Ulrich............................Vincent
Shirley Knight..........................Beverly
Yeardley Smith..........................Jackie
Lup Ontiveros...........................Nora
Jesse James.............................Spencer Stone
Directed by James L. Brooks      Written by Marcus Andrus, James L. Brooks
Rated PG-13                             Length: 138 minutes
        (http://us.imdb.com  or  http://italy.imdb.com)
Review (c) 1997 Dennis Lewis
Articles in Out & About North Florida (c) Lesbian and Gay Community
Association of Jacksonville
 

Author
Scott Renshaw
     James L. Brooks has a rare gift as a film-maker:  the ability to give
the people what they want while also giving them what _he_ wants.  TERMS
OF ENDEARMENT was a crowd-pleasing tear-jerker buoyed by smart comedy and
rich characterizations; BROADCAST NEWS brought a throwback romantic comedy
sensibility to an upscale study of journalistic ethics with an
unexpectedly down-beat conclusion.  Even the notorious Little Musical That
Wasn't I'LL DO ANYTHING demonstrated Brooks' willingness to cut bait when
he knew the audience had no interest in what he was offering.  His
instincts have proven as irreproachable as they are unconventional.
     AS GOOD AS IT GETS had the potential for a classic written all over
it.  For once, however, Brooks doesn't have a grip on how best to handle
his material.  He casts Jack Nicholson as a bile-spewing satyr, then turns
him into a repentant bile-spewing satyr.  He crafts an appealing
relationship between two troubled and mis-matched characters, then muddles
the mix by throwing in a third troubled character.  He takes 90 minutes of
great material and drags it out over nearly two and a half hours.
     It didn't have to be like that.  AS GOOD AS IT GETS has a wonderful
character at its center, a truly horrible human being named Melvin Udall
(Nicholson).  A reclusive writer diagnosed with obsessive-compulsive
disorder, Melvin has turned his condition into carte blanche to insult and
berate everyone with whom he comes in contact.  That includes Carol
Connelly (Helen Hunt), the waitress who serves him breakfast every
morning, and goes double for his neighbor, gay artist Simon Bishop (Greg
Kinnear).  Then, unexpectedly, Melvin finds himself forced to do something
for someone else, caring for Simon's dog Verdell after Simon is beaten in
a robbery attempt.  That one act seems to launch Melvin on a spate of
selflessness, including helping Carol with her sickly son and driving
Simon to meet with his estranged parents.
     It's an admirable theme for a film, this notion of a man deciding to
change himself when he realizes the effect those changes have on other
people.  But why, of all people, Jack Nicholson?  The pre-conversion
Melvin is an outrageous delight, getting away with hateful rantings few
other characters could without inspiring protests.  His growth as a
character saps him of all his bad-boy energy, leaving in its place a
tricky romance with Hunt which somehow works even with Nicholson
perpetually looking like he's straining at the end of a leash.
     That romance might have been even more effective if Brooks had kept
his attention fixed on how Melvin and Carol are so good and so bad for
each other.  Hunt is superb and heart-breaking as the single mother
struggling to discover how to live her own life again, matching Nicholson
for don't-mess-with-me vigor.  Yet there's always Simon there in the
background, a distracting tangent the lightweight Kinnear can't invest
with sufficient gravity.  His story adds little but the adorably grungy
Verdell, a couple of showboating scenes for Cuba Gooding Jr. as a fuming
art dealer, and a lot of padding to an already over-long film.
     Brooks is too adept with a witty line to turn out a tedious film, and
Nicholson and Hunt too capable to fumble the well-rounded
characterizations.  AS GOOD AS IT GETS simply turns out to be a rare case
of Brooks failing to ride what works for all it's worth.  It's funny but
fitful, because we know this isn't as good as a James L. Brooks film gets.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: James L. Brooks
Cast: Jack Nicholson, Helen Hunt, Greg Kinnear, Cuba Gooding, Jr.,
Shirley Knight, Skeet Ulrich
Rated PG-13: Language, nudity, violence
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    I never thought any film labeled as a "romantic comedy" could be
this good. I always associate a certain vocabulary with films commonly
referred to as romantic comedies; words in this vocabulary
include--trite, phony, contrived, dull, formulaic, careful, and shallow.
I was relieved as I watched As Good as it Gets because I couldn't
associate any of these words with this film. In fact, James L. Brooks'
new film is the antithesis of all of these words combined, a moving,
often thought-provoking story about a truly awful individual.
    That individual is Melvin Udall, a racist, gay-hating,
obsessive-compulsive curmudgeon. He's also a novelist and lives in an
upper class apartment in New York. Across the hall is Simon (Greg
Kinnear), a gay artist who is, of course, extremely nice, and has a cute
little dog. Melvin eats lunch every day in the same diner, and his
waitress is always Carol (Helen Hunt), a mother just barely scraping by
because her son is sickly and always needing medical attention.
    One fateful day, Simon is painting a picture of a friend of a friend
(Skeet Ulrich), whose friends are in the other room, stealing all of
Simon's things. When Simon goes to investigate, he gets beaten within an
inch of his life. He loses all inspiration for painting and soon runs
out of money. Meanwhile, Melvin really likes Carol, and despite his
conduct towards her, he pays for real medical care for her son, who soon
recovers completely. Then, the three people unite in a road trip to
Baltimore in order for Simon to get money from his parents, to whom he
hasn't spoken in years.
    The first thing that really struck me about As Good as it Gets are
the risks it takes, in dialogue and ultimately in characterizations.
Melvin, for instance, is not one of those likable old curmudgeons--this
guy is really despicable. In one extremely tense scene, he makes the
mistake of insinuating that Carol's son doesn't have a long time to
live, and her reaction to this is one of complete emotional rage. He
also makes jokes--jokes that aren't really intended to be funny--about
people's weight, religion (he attacks Jews in one scene), and sexuality
(note the almost endless jokes about Simon and his homosexuality).
    Though these moments aren't exactly pleasant, they do help to create
a very solid character. This character is brought to life even more so
by Jack Nicholson's performance--as far as I'm concerned, this is his
best performance since One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest. Nicholson tends
to have that "I'm Jack Nicholson" aura around him when he's playing bad
guys or token characters, but here he gives a deep and convincing
performance as Melvin. Later developments of the character are extreme,
and we can still see the same old Melvin there, but we know he's trying
thanks to Nicholson.
    The supporting performances are of the best this year. Helen Hunt
proves once again that she can effortlessly upstage the sometimes
limited realm of television and gives a truly moving performance as a
strong-minded woman who really loves her son. Kinnear, too, goes way
beyond anything I've ever seen him in (I still remember him from Talk
Soup) and creates this frustrated man with ease.
    There is something truly magical and refreshing about this film--it
left me with a smile on my face that lasted for hours and hours after
the film was over. The mixture of different people is fascinating and
fun to watch. I loved these characters, and I loved their interactions
through Brooks' witty dialogue and realistic situations. I wanted to
believe that these people are alive somewhere in New York, just as
depicted in this film. And when the screen blacks out in the end, I knew
they were going to go right on living, and that everything would be
okay.

Author
Jamie Peck
TriStar / 2:18 / 1997 / PG-13 (harsh language, semi-nudity, a beating)
Cast: Jack Nicholson; Helen Hunt; Greg Kinnear; Shirley Knight; Cuba Gooding, 
Jr.; Skeet Ulrich; Yeardley Smith; Lupe Ontiveros; Jamie Kennedy 
Director: James L. Brooks 
Screenplay: Mark Andrus; James L. Brooks 
There's something about Jack Nicholson that makes him such a unmatched pleasure 
to watch -- his eyes, his voice, his entire demeanor, they all radiate the very 
foundation of cool. His presence is a complex one; pensive and droll at the same 
time, it's hard not to watch some of his more serious work (like in "A Few Good 
Men"'s courtroom climax) and emit nervous chuckles while being wowed at the 
strength of his composure. Nicholson's so versatile, it's a pity he doesn't get 
more comedic roles like the one he plays to perfection in James L. Brooks' "As 
Good As It Gets." Slated for Christmas day opener along side of many other 
high-profile releases, "As Good As It Gets" will likely rely on Nicholson to at 
first draw the crowds in. Then, hopefully, the movie will do the rest. 
Nicholson's middle-aged, obsessive-compulsive writer Melvin Udall
introduces his curmudgeonly self from "Good"'s get-go, as he stalks a
neighbor's pooch while it roams their New York City apartment
building's hallway. After it threateningly lifts its leg one too many
times, Melvin grabs the pup and tosses it down the garbage chute. The
dog's owner, homosexual artist Simon Bishop (Greg Kinnear), doesn't
actually witness the event, but has no trouble finding the correct
foundation of blame once his pet turns up. Melvin, you see, has quite
a history of trouble with people in general, much of it stemming from
his snide demeanor -- he's simply not afraid to speak his mind, even
if what comes out is mean, damaging or downright spiteful. But it's
not treatment reserved for those who've wronged him -- Melvin even
mouths off to complete strangers. To a fan who wants to know how he
writes from the female perspective so well: "I think of a man, and
then I take away reason and accountability." To a hipster Jewish
couple sitting in his regular seat at a local diner: "I think people
who speak in metaphors oughta shampoo my crotch." You get the idea.
Melvin's only friend -- or, rather, the only person he can stand -- is
Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt), a waitress with a sickly son. But he even
alienates himself from her after making an extremely discouraging
remark about the kid's health; the child soon becomes so ill that
Carol takes leave from her employment.  Meanwhile, Simon is nearly
killed after walking in on a robbery in his apartment, and Melvin is
forced to take care of the dog he's tried to harm on so many
occasions. This starts something of melting process, and his
companionship with Fido leads to a greater understanding of what it's
like to have a friend. Melvin then tries to make peace with Carol in a
completely humane way, even if his efforts are, at first, rooted in
selfishness.
With his performance here, Nicholson stands to sweep at least the
nominations of major awards contests, if not take the actual trophies
home. His Melvin is quite an irascible, profane concoction, the type
of flawed, juicy character you really enjoy spending your time getting
to know. Hunt, as the female lead, is very much on his level, her
sense of devotion and determination palpable. Carol is probably the
most ordinary (for lack of a better word) person here, but Hunt keeps
her from becoming too ordinary; a scene where she attempts to read
Melvin a thank-you note demonstrates this. It's a welcome relief to
see Kinnear in a role that suits his talents instead of undermining
them (like "Dear God" and "A Smile Like Yours," his two most recent
features). Cuba Gooding, Jr. is fine in a minor part as a friend of
Simon's, and "Scream" alums Skeet Ulrich and Jamie Kennedy pop up --
welcome but so underused -- as male hustlers.
Brooks and Mark Andrus' screenplay is rich in personality and sharp,
memorable one-liners (some of which are painfully hysterical). Careful
consideration has been paid to the three leads -- the
obsessive-compulsive jerk, the down-on-her-luck waitress and the
struggling gay painter could have all been turned into creaky cliches,
which would have made this long picture quite a chore to sit
through. But they're all delicious, original creations, and watching
them help each other towards a mean of self-realization is both
fascinating and funny.  When a romance develops between Melvin and
Carol, it feels alternately forced and stirring -- the former at
perhaps a too-happy climax that fails to offer extensive closure for
Simon, the latter during a splendid dining sequence when Melvin
confesses that knowing her makes him "want to be a better man." The
love angle doesn't really work because it lacks a complete emotional
element (something a la "Jerry Maguire"), and the movie could have
been shorter and a little sweeter if it had trimmed a few things in
that area.
The ads for "As Good As It Gets" read "Brace yourself for Melvin," an
accurate warning considering the character's penchant for ill-tempered
political incorrectness. But brace yourself for Jack, too, because his
Melvin is full of the snazzy acting that attracts Oscar. Forget last
December 25th's awful "The Evening Star," where his cameo was the
liveliest thing in the film. And cross out this past spring's so-so
caper thriller "Blood & Wine," where he was fine but the movie
wasn't. Nicholson's back in "As Good As It Gets," and he's as great as
he gets.
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Author
Luke Buckmaster
Every now and then a truly memorable character enters the movie scheme.  In
1995, audiences couldnt help but feel sympathy for the slow-witted Forrest
Gump. Last year, Billy Bob Thortons character __ made us think twice about our
place in society.   This year a horror of a human being (with a compulsive
disorder) will somehow manage to nudge his place into our hearts.
Melvin Udall has a love for simple pleasures.  Cleaning his hands meticulously,
only ever drinking bottled water and scoffing down a huge breakfast every
morning are as important to Melvin as life itself.  Racist, sexist, unreasonable
and repulsive, he seems to suit the title of a demented grouch perfectly.
Working as a romance novelist, Melvin keeps to himself for most of the time and,
although his daily traditions are just they way he likes them, ultimately leads
an unhappy life.
A dedicated romance novel fan asks Melvin How do you write women so well?  I
think of a man, he replies, and I take away reason and accountability.
If what you have read so far tends you make you believe that Melvin is somewhat
of a tough cookie, youre absolutely correct.  And when this type of guy gets a
crush on a young, sweet and caring lady, interesting situations will no doubt
occur.  Our young lady is Christine Cookie (Helen Hunt), who is Melvins
favorite waitress at the local restaurant.  Well, favorite is an under
statement  he simply wont eat his morning feast unless Christine is there
taking his order.  So when she is unable to attend work due to a severe illness
of her sons, Melvin does everything in his power to make sure she is at work
the next morning  and funds all of Christines doctor and hospital bills.
An unlikely relationship forms between the two, and Melvins gay neighbor Simon
(Boof Gert) gets thrown in amongst the emotional chaos.  Thus a three-way search
for happiness begins, where each character craves their own set of desires.  Our
man Melvin does what mainstream cinema would expect: realizes the error of his
ways and begins to change into a nicer human being.  As he says to Christine
during dinner, You make me want to be a better person.
If youre not impressed by the engaging character that is Melvin, As Good as it
Gets wonderful acting and a plot that unravels with beauty and well-placed
comedy; there is another factor that seems to have the greatest significance of
all.  It starts with J and it ends with S.
Although the media spotlight may focus on Jack Nicholson as the selling point
for As Good as it Gets, director James L. Brooks also deserves to take much of
the credit.  His directing career has not gone unnoticed, but there is no doubt
that this film is clearly his best work in the 90s.


Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Jack Nicholson; Helen Hunt; Greg Kinnear; Cuba Gooding Jr. & Skeet
Ulrich
Jack Nicholson and Helen Hunt both won Oscars for their performances in As
Good As It Gets, and Greg Kinnear was nominated for his performance as well.
For a movie that received such attention at the awards ceremonies, it was
certainly a heck of a disappointment. As Good As It Gets was marketed as
sort of a romantic comedy, but this movie was short on comedy and the
romance was the pits.
Nicholson plays an obsessive-compulsive writer who, to put it bluntly, is
obnoxious. He falls in love with his waitress at the local restaurant (Helen
Hunt), who just happens to have a gravely ill son. Throw in to the mix
Nicholson's gay next door neighbor (Greg Kinnear), who Nicholson's character
takes great delight in tormenting and you have the basis for a movie that
isn't that great. Certainly not worthy of all the critical acclaim that it
has received. But then again, what do critics know? Adding to the intricate
plot twists of the movie (I'm being sarcastic here, just in case you missed
it), Kinnear's character gets beaten up when he walks in on burglars. So by
some miracle of modern cinematic genius, Kinnear, Hunt and Nicholson go off
on some road trip so Kinnear's character can go beg his parents for money to
tide him over until he recovers from his injuries. It sounds stranger than
it actually is, but it really isn't significantly better.
If it were anyone else other than Jack Nicholson playing the role of the
obsessive-compulsive belligerent lead character, I will go out on a limb and
say that this movie would have crashed and burned within the first ten
minutes. But since it is Jack, no matter how unlikable the character is, you
still have to begrudgingly be rooting for him. Nicholson injected enough
humor into the part to prevent me from hating the character. As for Helen
Hunt, I have no idea why she ever won an Oscar for her performance. Her
acting abilities are not bad, but the character was so whiny that I kept
wondering what the heck Nicholson's character saw in her. Next to Nicholson,
Greg Kinnear gave the most solid performance in this film, although even he
was also a little on the whiny side. Cuba Gooding Jr. should also be
mentioned as one of Kinnear's gay friends. Cuba stole every scene he was in,
including those that he shared with Nicholson -- no small feat.
Aside From the good performances from Nicholson, Kinnear, and Gooding, there
is really no other reason to recommend that people actually sit through As
Good As It Gets. The love story isn't that compelling. I never cared if
Nicholson and Hunt ever got together. On top of that, Nicholson mellowed far
too quickly for my liking. At the first of the film he was just plain
obnoxious, towards the end he was almost likable which seemed to be just a
little too convenient for my tastes. As Good As It Gets ranks as one of the
bigger disappointments in recent years.

Author
Michael Redman
Finding the courage to face life full-on is a difficult task. Summoning up the
audacity to fall in love is a harder job. If you're a total jerk like Melvin
Udall is, the odds are even more against you.
Melvin (Jack Nicholson) is a successful romance author who is just the
opposite of what you would expect someone in that profession to be. A solitary
man hidden away in his New York apartment with no human interaction and not
even a hint of ever having been in a passionate relationship, he avoids the
outside world as much as possible.
His obsessive-compulsive disorder rules his life as he uses several different
bars of soap to wash his hands and refuses to step on a crack on the sidewalk.
(There's a great scene when he has to cross a floor made of mosaic tiles --
_very_small_ mosaic tiles.)
Melvin has some great lines. When his publisher's receptionist asks him how he
writes women so well in his books, he responds "I think of men and I take away
reason and accountability." Don't get him wrong, he's not merely a misogynist.
Setting his sights higher than that, he's also a homophobe, racist,
anti-Semite, xenophobe, animal-hater and intensely dislikes people who talk in
metaphors. When we first meet him, he's busy dumping a neighbor's dog down the
garbage chute. He's an equal opportunity bigot.
He does venture outside his apartment every day to eat breakfast at a local
cafe. Melvin is such a grouchy curmudgeon that waitress Carol Connelly (Helen
Hunt) is the only one willing to wait on him. And she's none too happy about
it. 
When Carol doesn't show up for work, Melvin's routine is shot and he's
determined to do something about it. Tracking down her address, he shows up at
her place begging her to come back to work so that he can eat breakfast. The
fact that she's a poor single mother caring for a chronically ill son doesn't
appear to phase him, he wants his food.
Much more upsetting is that his gay artist neighbor Simon Bishop (Greg
Kinnear) is brutally attacked during a robbery. This doesn't upset Melvin much
("Don't worry, you'll be back on your knees in no time") but when he is
bullied into taking care of Simon's dog, his life is turned topsy-turvey.
Melvin is sequestered because he's afraid of what's out there on the other
side of his apartment door. He has to make sure it's ritualistically locked
three times to keep the world on its proper side. When he brings the dog home
he reluctantly grows fond of it, talking to it and taking it everywhere he
goes. This little crack in his emotional armor opens him up.
Hiding behind his need for Carol to return to work so she can serve him, he
pays for a specialist to treat her son. He even develops a friendship with
Simon. 
All three people are heavily damaged. Melvin has retreated from life in his
apartment. Carol has devoted herself to her son, convinced that she has to
give up her life for him. Simon is estranged from his parents and his friends
disappear when he is hospitalized and his money runs out. A more unlikely trio
to form relationships, you'd rarely see.
And in the midst of it all, there are some wonderful moments. Melvin is
hilarious in his grouchiness and touching as he attempts to be nice. "You make
me want to be a better man," he tells her. One of the best aspects is that
even as he opens up, he is still a curmudgeon.
Carol, afraid that his monetary contribution to the wellness of her son hides
a hidden agenda rushes over to his apartment in the rain to explain in no
uncertain terms that she will never sleep with him. It only takes her a second
to realize that she is delivering that statement while looking as if she just
left a wet t-shirt contest.
There's hardly anything left to say about Jack Nicholson. I don't remember
ever seeing him in anything less than a stellar performance and his
over-the-edge Melvin is no disappointment. Nicholson may be the best actor
working today.
Hunt does a commendable job matching Nicholson's energy. She isn't afraid to
be seen as something less than a babe and her portrayal of exhausted run-down
Carol struggling with seemingly overwhelming obligations is top-notch.
Their on-screen chemistry is a bit odd. Each does a wonderful job with the
character, but together, there's something a little off. It's a minor problem:
they do work well together, but that missing element is what prevents this
from being a four-star film.
Director James L. Brooks ("Terms Of Endearment", "Broadcast News") has a movie
that is picking up awards by the bucketsful (nominees for all the top Golden
Globes, winners from the National Board Of Review, inevitable Oscars) and has
a winner on his hands.
"As Good As It Gets" isn't exactly the quality that the title says, but it's
pretty darn close.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 22 years and as soon as he
finishes this one, he's off to an annual 12 Night celebration typically held
in freezing weather during a snowstorm. This year it's in the sixties and
raining. That wacky El Nino.)
[This appeared in the 1/8/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman
